I would then start a new job feeling like it was a fresh start for me, full of good intentions to not get drunk with my new colleagues.
It's a little too gassy in the glass to be my very favourite bottled beer, but the bottle-conditioning is among the best on the market, resulting in an effortlessly clear pour with no need whatsoever for tears or tantrums.
Former senator Rick Santorum (R-Pa.). (Steve Pope/Getty Images)“This is unacceptable,” Santorum said on ABC’s “This Week.” “The idea that a mistake was made — clearly a mistake, which we should not have apologized for — it was a mistake. There was nothing deliberate..?.?.Killing Americans in uniform is not a mistake. It was something that deliberate.”
Weddings Can Be Murder is a great novel by Christie Craig.
Oh! New Year soon! Maybe I should schedule a hair appointment.
The undemocratic and unconstitutional ban on dubbing has made sure that in a fast globalising world, Kannadigas are left with very little choice of knowledge and entertainment shows offered in Kannada. Except for the boring soap operas, fighting news channels, and macchu-kocchu movies, I do not have anything in Kannada that tickles my senses.
And find your hotel room or crash space. You aren't catching the last MARC train home that late. (Though, to be fair, there IS an option of a 3:15 AM Amtrak departure from Union Station on Saturday morning, Northeast Regional 150, priced at only $11.00 one way...... and also stops at BWI Marshall Airport Station..... which would give you time to explore a couple other D.C. spots like District Chop House, Gordon Biersch, etc. . . .)
Research Technologist
“I know, but you can think of another fun name.”
I was still in High School, and it was a school day.
Anyway I am going to be a Soulbow which is a psionic ranged character that is a prestige class of the Soulknife. I don't quite know how I want to make it but I have thought about it before and basically I have to start at around 6 so I can actually be of use as before that I am just a melee guy trying to do ranged combat without a good weapon.
Not everyone in Wisconsin knew that the issues that Wisconsin needed fixing were Voter ID, hiding guns in your pants, punishing teachers for belonging to unions, and stealing government money to pay for budget shortfalls.
Even informal homeschool co-ops, which exist in many communities, help parents share best practices with each other. But the families that give me the most concern seem to have a lot of self-imposed isolation: the children don’t participate in music groups or sports teams, and the family doesn’t participate in community activities or attend worship services.
I think that there are a lot of really little issues that are affecting her. By themselves, no big deal. All happening at once, she's a little out of sorts.
We must pray for God’s Will and not our will.
Clip length (maximum): 1 h 30 min (high or normal quality). Dependable on available memory.
This book tells the story of two women, two periods in history, two countries and two very different lives. How is a modern day medical receptionist linked to one of Anne Boleyn’s ladies in waiting?
Unpublished Manuscript Contest Moneymakers
Guernica - Picasso
4) 8 Los Angeles Kings 4 @ 1 Vancouver Canucks 2, LAK 1-0
In the context of civil wars, atrocities that are not genocidal in their goals are often claimed to be carried out for rational reasons, e.g., promote ethnic cohesion, secure access to resources, deter civilians from supporting the other warring party, forcibly recruit soldiers, or improve bargaining positions and counter military setbacks (cf. Valentino, Huth & Balch-Lindsay 2004; Kathman & Wood 2009; Wood 2010). Atrocities are thus a symptom of military weakness, inability to provide other incentives (such as providing public services, or security) or lack of public support in militarily contested areas (Ibid.). Meanwhile, when rebels enjoy broad support and/or can provide public services, rebel atrocities serve no rational purpose, and may instead undermine public support and in extension strengthen opposing warring parties. Whereas government forces usually have some form of logistics and financial resources, rebels are dependent on civilians for, e.g., material resources, food, information and sanctuary (Ibid). This explanation describes accurately the situation in North and South Kivu, where civilians are "punished" and join rebel groups - or do not oppose them - out of fear. Rebels can often only offer life or death.
This country fought a civil war over slavery based on skin color. People marched in the streets and got brutalized, even killed, protesting discrimination.
This afternoon Eric came over for my first lesson. He really liked my guitar and he played "Blackbird" on it. I may or may not have hyperventilated! He taught me the song "Smoke On The Water" by Deep Purple and the D, C, and G chords. I am not very good. I keep tilting my guitar up so I can see the frets and the strings and I don't push down hard enough on the strings. But I think if I practice, I can get used to it (I definitely need to toughen up my fingers). I am supposed to learn the song "Blowing In The Wind" by Bob Dylan and memorize the strings for my next lesson. I am really excited to finally start playing! Hopefully I will be playing "Blackbird" in no time...once I can hold the guitar correctly!
"Read it, girl!"
2 machines
This is Lady on the day of my bridal portraits... and yes, that is a wreath of roses that I made for her...
Monday morning, Austin asked me if he could stay home from school because he didn't feel well. He said he felt like throwing up.
And when I do pick up a newspaper, I don’t read it for the news.
04 - Final Demand
It was a glorious day in MN today. It was sunny with temps in the low 80s and low humidity. In the words of Bruce Almighty it was a "B-E-A-utiful day".
Everything will pass
Information: Here is a video of people dancing argentine tango de salon - tango-vals, technically, in this case - on a small floor in southern Germany.
A hireling is a wage worker or a hired servant whose sole concern is their compensation while a Levite is a servant of the Lord Jesus Christ who is called into full time service and therefore committed to serving others and caring for their place of employment as unto the Lord.
they build my level of empathy,
Anyhow, the food at their Cafe was excellent. The service was wonderful and it's at a great location. If you are thinking of having a welcome dinner or a rehearsal dinner on the south side of Mau`i, you should definitely consider the Tommy Bahama Cafe. Or even if you want to do just a bridal party luncheon, it will be a great spot for that as well.
5. Rain Machine - Give Blood (3:26)
I'm just glad no one got sick, although, my mother told me to stop experimenting on the whole dinner and just set aside the experimental portion for myself! Some of my experiments were successful--like soy sauce and honey glazed fried chicken, delicious! Those became a family fave. Others were failures--like cocoa flavored pancakes--awful! Just gawd awful! I learned that unsweetened cocoa powder is not the same as chocolate powder! It was bitter, salty and not sweet at all! The only thing worse than my cocoa pancakes were the soy sauce pancakes! Even the dogs refused to eat them!
It wasn’t until I heard a drum cover by comearoundpheonix or Lindsay Raye Ward on YouTube that I really downloaded her album. The cover was fantastic as well as the song and I really love how Lana changes up the melody to show her full range, although, I don’t commend folks who reach their upper register with their head voice over their true chest voice or even a mix. It just seems like cheating to me, like travelling on the road taken.
2 Nephi 2:22
And ever, as the story drained
D. Dogs: one- boston terrier, Cita!
Kim Hung-kwang, who was a computer science professor at a North Korean university – and now heads a defectors’ intellectual group – says Pyongyang has a proven capability for distributed denial of service (DDoS) attacks via the Internet.
If you don’t have a belief or faith, but are pondering the thought of a different kind of spiritual walk and are asking, what now? This book is for you. If you have walked away or taken a break from the Christian life and are hesitant to go back, so you find yourself asking, what now? This book is for you. If you’re a Christian and have found yourself asking more and more questions about beliefs that you used to defend ruthlessly, for some reason they just don’t settle well anymore. This book is for you.
This is a very easy dish to prepare and kids are sure to love it. A good way to get kids to eat French beans. The taste of fried eggs with a little garlic chilli sauce is nice. My kids love to eat the eggs with tomato sauce!
Tuesday in her store at
Sinner, how he yearned to be
Q046) Your childhood nickname was?
Beer: Adnams ‘American IPA’ Cask 4.8%
2. Naach
At the end of the last three years of the high school, students must take an examination, called “esame di maturità”, in order to obtain the “diploma di maturità” and consequently to attend the University and faculty they wish.
I hope this isn't just a jumbled mess, it was very, I want to say liberating for me, I didn't put alot of "thought" into this, I honestly just typed what came to my heart ( and then spell checked and checked the grammar, which is probably still wrong, all the while praying it made sense) ;)
Yet all of this has apparently gone unnoticed by ‘him’ upstairs.
I like to bump up the contrast in Photoshop of HDR shots after the tone mapping is finished; I feel it gives a cleaner look with more tonal depth. Tone mapped images can look a little bland to me and bumping up the contrast finishes off a shot how I like it.
Be tenacious and write it in stone. Make it non negotiable. My son wants a video game system, he’s wanted it for several months. He has asked me, asked dad, asked Nana etc, he works lemonade stands and bugs me and bugs me. He will not give up, he really wants this, it’s his goal to get it and nothing will stop him. He has taught me some lessons on goals with out a doubt and he will be getting what he desires for his birthday.
I decided to give it a shot. If for nothing else, I just wanted to see the public school system in action...testing, evaluating, categorizing and compartmentalizing. In other words, standardizing. How the heck can you standardize intelligence anyway? Isn't that what they were looking for? The SMART kids? The GIFTED kids? How the heck can a test tell you that? Anyway, I thought I'd find out. We had already missed the main test date, but they were told we would be lucky to get into a special testing date held especially for private and homeschooled children. ooohhh, thank you so muuuuuuch for accommodating my little fam.
I used to think I was a person nobody loved. Now I know that I am something far worse. I am a person who is loved without deserving to be. I am a black hole; people pour energy and kindness into me, hoping to light me up, but I am simply a void. I suck up energy and destroy it. People confuse my immaturity for childlike whimsy and they mistakenly see me as likeable. And then the real me comes out, and I am poison. And gradually everyone becomes tired of me and goes away.
Then along came Stephen the Rock, a weird magician who wanted to restore the temple to its original frog-worshipping purpose. Anyone who disagreed with him was "cast into the breeding pools" or "struck down by lightning." A great power struggle ensued and many people were slain on both sides, but eventually the bandits were driven off or enslaved. The temple has now been refortified, and anyone with knowledge of its whereabouts has been slain. Thus, it is now SECRET again! And the Temple denizens are once again up to their nefarious, no-good, frog-worshipping activities again. Stephen the Rock is now High Priest.
are women not men. I also have seen a plthara of thongs, more then I need to see on every size! Last but
Rule #1: Indie or Underground Only
Maybe you have searched over the web, flipped lots of magazine pages, gone through window shopping, asked for your best friend's advice, or even check with a fashion designer on what is totally "in" this year. But now, let me summarize all that you've got so far and provide you with a simpler fashion guide trends for 2010 prom dresses . Here goes:
The coolest part:
Kevin xx
“Whatever's the matter?” she said.
“That’s your plan?” asked Laurel. “Run away and let someone else deal with it.”
The ANC just doesn't disappoint. After repeatedly stealing tax money, engaging in corruption and nepotism, and forcing Whites and other minorities out of the workplace, it seems the South African government is running out of money and have had to come up with more creative ways of getting a slice of the White wealth. Cue the new SARS (SA tax office) initiative of having all expat South Africans declare their income if they have a revenue stream or assets in the country. Fancy that. Why would they need you to declare your income if you no longer reside in the country? Well, as most well-qualified Whites have fled the country and taken their taxes with them, the ANC is now wanting to know how much they can start collecting from people living overseas. They really must be desperate. They've bled the country dry and borrowed all over the place to pay for their 'infrastructure' projects that they now have to go after those who left the country to get away from all the thieving and crime. By the way, I wonder what happened to all the money the Soccer World Cup would have generated for the country? The tax payers are still paying off all the white-elephant stadiums and will continue to do so for the next few decades, whilst the profit was pocketed by the ANC and their comrades. Well, if you are an expat and still have assets in the country then best you start filling in your tax form as the ANC wants their cut of your earnings! In the meantime, SA Minister of Finance Pravin Gordhan, is heading off to the G-20 meeting wanting more World Bank and IMF 'reform'. Oooo, is the ANC wanting more free money off the backs of working people around the world Mr Gordhan? Surely not?
Yes. I’d say I’m a true fanatic than a casual fan. Whether they win or lose, I’ll be there. The atmosphere is a bit different when they’re winning though.
But this is not because "they're a macro" - it's because of the specific organisational policies and practices I've outlined. Interbrew in the old days were not like this. Not all AB-Inbev's competitors are like this. My point is, it's not about how big they are, it's about what they do - it's about their record.
The Give-a-way. I'm sort of trying to let this be our last big push for awhile. It's been really crazy. I've asked friends to share and post about it and a few things that I'm realizing. The back and forth in my brain during fundraising and social media promotions is pretty exhausting. Every time I start to feel like maybe I'm being obnoxious
Metro Éireann has heard that the woman in question was refused by an official at the Garda National Immigra-tion Bureau (GNIB) when she declined to remove her headscarf for the photograph required for her residency card.
The second piece attempts a similar thing, except this time not quite so elegantly. Recalling more than anything Mike Kelley's Memory Ware project, Golia's constellation paintings rebuild and retool as art the unexpected and completely odd event of the cab crash. Like Kelley dragged the Detroit River looking for mementos tossed into the depths both strange and ordinary to use in resin paintings, Golia too embeds the detritus of history, his personal history, into a two dimensional platform. As paintings, they are unremarkable, sort of bad Alberto Burris or Tom Friedmans that don't wink at you. As a concept, they are not quite as strong as the concrete cakes. They less sure of themselves, a bit forced.
4. It is an inside problem of the heart which results in the outside expression
The video – that revealed a “second Obama term” for what it would be – was mysteriously removed and literally purged from most of the internet. That video which was once all over the Obama campaign site now appears here and very few other places. The accompanying story from Daily Caller appears below:
Dwarsliggers are pocket-sized, hardcover books that are read from top to bottom instead of left to right. They’re a sixth of the size of a normal book and their special spines let them stay open without the need for constant pressure from your fingers. They’re known as librinos in Spain, point2 in France and—you guessed it—flipbacks in England.
Triple Ginger Cupcakes
So why the blog?
Oh, here I am examining the goose egg on my knee from whacking it on the ice:
So while I haven't been doing the cardio, I have been doing a little weight training. Working on the ever dreaded batwings and doing situps with the exercise ball I have. I really should start taking measurments since the scale doesn't like to move. Maybe I'd find motivation there?
D: BBQ *Ck on Homemade Buns & Veggies
BLITZER: Shortly after that interview, the Cuban representative in
10. The Dogs Of War (08:22)
But the thing about Gen is that there’s always a lot more going on than either the first-time reader or any of the other characters suppose. He is truly an unreliable narrator – an infuriating, intelligent, highly-strung, secretive, multi-layered individual whom you get to like very much indeed. And the book, with its sequels, is set in an almost but-not-quite familiar early Mediterranean world, where gods are worshipped who resemble the Greek pantheon but are not – and where small city states war against one another, or form alliances, under the shadow of a powerful Eastern empire.
The Macy’s Parade would not be complete without a little razzle dazzle from some of the nation’s best performance groups. They add a dose of pomp and cheer, not to mention flips, dips, spins and vocal acrobatics. From cheerleaders to a Bollywood dance ensemble, this year’s Parade features a host of unique performers. Set to wow the crowds are performers from the Arya Dance Company, Big Apple Circus, Spirit of America Dance, Stage Door Manor, Stepper-ettes, Tap City Youth Ensemble, US Pizza Team, Varsity Spirit Cheer and The Young Americans.
... well, we're over the Excitement That Was Nancy Sinatra. No, it hasn't taken me that long to recover, but life... well, it just gets In The Way sometimes doesn't it.
We have an awesome sponsor this month, Simply Betty Stamps! They just had a Halloween new release because proprietor Betty is a Halloween nut like me! Be sure to check out her fantastic selection of rubber, clear, and digi stamps found here in the shop. There is also a Simply Betty Stamps blog to keep you up-to-date on things Betty! If you want the chance to win a cool prize from SBS as well as a chance to be our GDT member for September make sure you play along.
The film is very stylishly done. Everett narrates in a very poetic fashion and refers to everyone he knows as the best living person or most beautiful living girl. As he puts it, “At a certain point in life you realize you know more dead people than living.”
2’44 DPRSSN
Sentiment cut with the silhouette
www.hup.harvard.edu/catalog.php?isbn=9780674051836
- PIZZA. Can't get much rounder than that. And pie. Why else do you think they call the mathematical constant that is the ratio of any circle's circumference to its diameter pi? (Or if you want to be picky π? Hmmm?)
The price point is slightly cheaper then 9.99 for a 72 card Hanger Pack of Topps Flagship. The single packs are a dime more then a year ago at 1.09. 77 card blasters are $10.49 I believe.
Oh, by the way, the "great shit" was that I am to awaken people to see their own light. Plant seeds in their hearts so that they can grow spiritually and accomplish their own dharmas. I was excited about all of this, but feeling a little daunted by the task. Various reasons: I had seriously about ZERO friends in real life (though lots of friends on the internet living miles and miles away) and felt insecure about my ability to meet people and make new friends. Or NOT EVEN FRIENDS, just like people that want seeds planted in their hearts and shit by a total stranger. Ya. So there was that. Next, I got physically exhausted very easily and couldn't even muster the mental willingness or physical knowhow to plant any ACTUAL PLANT SEEDS, let alone spiritual seeds. So, there was that. On top of all of that stuff, I just BAAAAARLEY got my little dharma heart seedling planted when the herbicides of self doubt and insecurity almost shriveled them to dust. Obviously I had to take some time to nurture and grow my own seeds before I even dared give gardening advice.
An in-house paralegal’s day can be very unpredictable too. We do not have the deadlines for motions, hearings, depositions, and trial. Most often local counsel admitted in the jurisdiction of a pending legal matter handles those duties. Instead, in-house legal departments deal with whatever issue rear’s its head that day. It can make your day exciting, adds variety to your workload, and you are always gaining knowledge for your box of “legal tools.”
Carl Flickinger, 38, Conyers, N.Y.
30. Riders In The Sky (A Cowboy Legend) - Vaughn Monroe
Now, trucks carrying goods are parked inside the ICP premises.This has come as a major respite for tourists who throng the border every evening for The Retreat.
But I woke up feeling good…and that got me thinking about the medical journey I took to get to feeling good…which made me wonder about some of the women I met along the way…and then I couldn’t stop thinking about the women I didn’t meet.
banana blueberry
And, umm... just FYI, graham crackers are considered 'the perfect-fit jeans' of your culinary wardrobe.
I like you, Stephen Fry, I really do, but your sweeping generalisations on female sexuality are a bit shit. To me, it has the sort of quality that the Brand/Ross affair had, ie you think that your pronouncements are so damned important, even when they're half-cocked (heh), that nobody will disagree with you and you can say what you like.
Wednesday: Today we went to the park for a playdate the other mum and I organised over a week ago, when the weather was sunny and warm, and if not sunny and warm, it was sunny and hot. Except today :( It looked bad from the minute we woke up, and by mid-afternoon, when we were meeting, the sky looked decidedly grey. About 20 minutes into the playdate, it started to drizzle, and we convinced the kids it would stop soon. Of course, that is when the heavens opened, and we moved pretty quicksmart to my place for the rest of the afternoon!
Thanks to all the people who have let me know the Friday link-up is repeatedly not showing up on their post feed! I have no idea why, as all my other posts seem fine!
We firstly gate crashed by arriving on a tourist visa. Found a job and the rest was a breeze. Not much red tape here.
Somehow I never was able to arrange that — until last August, when I was at the Live Music Capital of the World and Matt’s band was playing a gig at Threadgill’s World Headquarters.
Prior to commencing any opposition, cancellation or federal trademark infringement action, a trademark owner should confirm that the registration(s) to be asserted are not vulnerable to attack. If problems are identified, a trademark owner may still bring an action; however, the plaintiff should be prepared to litigate its claims based on common law trademark rights. While a common law trademark owner’s burden of proof is higher, and scope of protection can be narrower than that of a federal trademark registrant, there may still be a basis for seeking protection under the law.
Nordic Walking Aracena
‘Oh?’
Poker Face – Lady Gaga
Can’t wait until all of our sets are revealed Friday morning? Well, you can pre-order them now if you like what you see on our designers’ blogs! Just click HERE. You’ll also see that we are offering our special New Release Bundle again – 10% off if you purchase all of our stamp sets in one bundle!
‘Oh, not that long,’ I told her out of a desire to soften the shock of his eventual death. ‘Just a couple of years probably.’
We as a race are the creators, producers and marketers of our own demise. Despite being told some years ago by a man in a white coat, and a beard that could only mean he was either a wizard or a scientist, that we were past the point of no return we still listen to the hippies as they dance around Stonehenge crying about the migration patterns of birds and the view of our beautiful beaches and rolling countryside. Have you been to our beautiful beaches? I have, and they are cold, windy and have that strange smell that has is not dissimilar to when you leave your school blazer in the kitchen while your Mum is making fish pie. Staring out to sea, to avoid the disgusting tumble weed of crisp packets and forsaken socks, I would not be horrified to catch a glimpse of a wind turbine. Also, I drove the beach only to get sand between the toes of my carbon footprint then go to the arcade because it was warm in there.
The lens features a built-in, pull-out-type filter holder in its barrel. By placing the C-PL (circular polarizing) filter (40.5mm in diameter; included as an exclusive accessory) on this holder, the user can easily rotate the filter to obtain the desired polarizing effect.
When I go to work this evening to sell Starburst and Peanut Butter Whoppers and Coca-Cola and Jennifer’s Body, I’m going to take off my shoes for a while. I’m going to go ahead and take the chance that there might be holy space at my job. Could be that I spend way too much time waiting for God to show up when, in fact, God is already there and he is waiting on me to show up, take off my shoes, and let Him speak.
On Friday night, we were invited to celebrate Julie's best friend's wedding! Kristin and Thomas were married in San Diego a couple of weeks ago and then they came back to Kansas to celebrate with their family and friends. Thomas is actually from Germany, so only his dad and best friend were able to make it, which was so special.
“Blaine just called. They found Chase’s body last night and a kid from school is missing again.”
1x09: Baelor = 10/10, 1x10: Fire And Blood = 10/10.
Tomorrow is another day.
Then of course there is the whole understanding of people. To a certain extent from watching those cute girlies you can actually learn from certain aspects the way people think. After all, these characters are based of one aspect of a person, mashed them together and you get the idea. But please never assume that they are one and the same, 2D and 3D will never ever mix, despite how much we want them to.
A lot of people I know have started blogs. They are usually filled with dramatic stories of hospitals, E.R. visits and promises to get better soon. I don’t want to have one of those blogs because I honestly want to be able to say that I am in recovery. But yet I also want to be as open as I choose to be. I am not sure yet how open this will be but I guess I shall see as I go along. I hope my blog will be filled with encouragement and progress but I am trying not to pass judgement on that fact. I am committing though that this is a recovery blog. I know if I begin to let myself drift into topics of sickness or behaviors I will only end up hurting myself and my recovery. So right now my goal is simply to let this be a place to write my feelings down, share what I have learned and honestly pass the time.
So it's no surprise that I feel so deflated and disappointed reading a book "everyone is talking about" and finding the main character with such a slight personality they would fall over in a stiff breeze.
I finally relaxed enough and stopped thinking about needle pricks and blood enough to get up and check on my boy. What did we learn from eight shots and a panel full of polka dots?
Now Jesus, that man led by example.
I'm upset that she killed Grandma
such a winter. Has the Earth
OK – it's just the under 20's –but many of those from Wales and the opposing teams will be the stars of rugby's future and you can boast I was there when the heir to Barry John played his very first game for Wales - etc
Some days I pick her up in the car, other days her father parks his ute at home and walks down to collect her, bringing her home up the street on his shoulders. The sight of them toddling up the road - stopping to look at trees and flowers and chat to (Dan) or cuddle (Lucinda) the neighbours - is positively heart-warming.
from the out and out funk of Clarence Smith, through the group soul harmonies of 21st Century to the proto-disco sound of the Howard Lemon Singers. If the connection with God sometimes seems tenuous, it was all part of the plan to bring you to Him by stealth.
"but you can't cry until after I'm finished..." and right then I knew it was coming!
Warm spring sun means raw food is back! What a relief.
Sun gets the most of my attention; Zhang is laconic and somewhat low-key but he has a vicious side that reminds me of a cobra. Sun gives him that sense that something dark and nasty hides just below the surface. Playing a man who is dangerous is a difficult proposition; doing it without giving much away emotionally is even harder but Sun pulls it off.
2) My top 5 most cherished values I would take a bullet for/What values define me and what values are most important to me:
I’d estimate a fifth of my time has been spent pining for lost loves. Mind you, there’s been a fair amount of multitasking going on. I’d also estimate a fifth of my energy has gone in to trying to win them back. It’s amazing how much of what we men of adventure do, we do for women. I’d also say that a fifth of all the tears I’ve wept have been devoted to these women. Dear me, have I truly wept so often? Yes, I suppose I have. I’ve wept so often I could cry.
This cannot be answered in one word, for life is a complex matter. Here is what is necessary:
4 bow
the taxi driver from the airport assured me he knew where my hotel, the golden tulip, was. i had a very general idea where it was from the airport because i'd checked on google earth just before my flight. now, my sense of direction is just south of shitty, but i still knew that we were heading the wrong direction as soon as we left the airport. i'd gotten him turned around with my broken arabic, and soon had him pulling over to ask directions from a police officer. after rounding the block several times because he kept missing the turn off, i was finally at my hotel. i checked in and went to my room to drop off my bags where i found this. yup, those are my bath towels folded on my bed in the shape of a heart and some swans.
So, trusty Google comes to my aid, and I type in 'Fireworks, name, child' and a link comes up to something pretty amazing.
My oldest daughter will be starting high school this fall and I wasn't exactly sure how to keep track of all the different things she'll be doing. Now I don't have to worry about it because there is a high school transcript in the planner as well as forms to track grades, books read, activities participated in, volunteer time, and everything else that I'll need to keep track of but hadn't thought of or come up with a way to do so yet. (And what perfect timing considering we'll be starting our new school year next Monday! Nothing like procrastination.)
 I think I heard what you thought you said
The cover is really cool. I like the simple, but understated feel to it. It sets you up for a complete surprise once you begin to read the book because it’s filled with tons of creepy and pulse-pounding moments. Penryn and Raffe’s uneasy relationship is surprisingly endearing and it only gets better as the book progresses. I wasn’t sure what to expect since this book seems to be classified as young adult, but I found there to be a number of mature subject matter involved and the only thing separating it from an adult novel is the lack of sex, though the themes are there.
She tensed in anticipation. He spanked each cheek several times and it stung, but it also sent a flood of desire through her like nothing ever had. He let go of her wrists, and she heard the rustle of clothing.
A guy from Switzerland who has overlanded the Asian continent in search of his calling to a bunch of daring Danish girls, who love traveling in general compartments on routes that take days to cover, a corporate hunk who despite his meetings and appointments, still manages to catch up with fellow travelers when in a new city to a student from France, studying in Kolkata, checking out the local markets in Chennai, it’s always a new story to talk about. Many of these people I have met do not just travel for the sake of it. They do it for a cause, for a reason, for submission. Although their reasons may vary, we are all, after all in the same boat.
that each of us would simmer down to the core as we share.
LuAnn also talks about how a date once asked her to split the bill and she said "how DARE you!" before she slapped him with her gloves and climbed into her horse-drawn buggy.
The more interesting point follows.
It leads us on to greatness
In the other match Everton host Sunderland and again this match will be very close. Sunderland rejuvenated under the management of Martin O’Neil are moving up the Premiership table and last weekend defeated Liverpool. Following this result Liverpool then played Everton on Tuesday night and promptly dispatched them 3-0. Just based on these results you have to favour Sunderland. With nothing much more to play for this season both of these teams will be putting full focus on this game and I expect a cracker. Kick Off: Sat 12:45 Prediction: Sunderland Win 3-2
Note also that even in one of the poorest countries in the region, very few girls enter the trade at an age below 15…just like everywhere else.
And a small cabin build there, of clay and wattles made;
Zubehör/Embellishments: My Mind's Eye Decorative Brad
Former CIA Analyst on Libya: ‘This Is Americans Killing Muslims Again And It Looks Like It’s for Oil ! You Are Just Carrying The Water For Mr. Obama!’ Catastrophic Water Dump Means Fukushima Really Out of Control ! Next Stop Syria? ‘Intervention on Cards After Libya Precedent’! Ron Paul: The FedRes ~ Bailing Out Libya And The World While America Suffers! Flashback 1988: Ron Paul Accuses The CIA, Bush Senior And The Democrats of Drug Trafficking! Gilad Atzmon: Goldstone’s U-Turn! MI5 Files: Zionist Terrorist Plotted To Kill Winston Churchill ! Holocaustianity: Zionism’s Big Lie! Fraudclosure And The Next Housing Shock! Peter Schiff: Hi-Ho Silver!! Paper Money is Losing Value!
And then in June 2011 I received an iPad2 for my 40th birthday!
That is overcast,
"Are you okay?" I asked.
As is popularity.
This is a dark teal polish that in the sun sparkles an awesome rainbow. I had to compress these pictures so you cant see the rainbows as well as you can in real life. This is two coats, although you could get away with just one. The formula is perfect and dry time is quick. A England polishes always seem to have great forumlas and are super easy to apply.
I would like to thank Alan for taking the time to conduct this interview! You can check out and purchase his book from Amazon by clicking here. I would also like to thank him for giving me an acknowledgement in the book, that reads, “Greg Caggiano, a close friend of mine, also helped keep me sane throughout my initial research and later work in the book. He was a person that I could bounce ideas off of, in addition to ranting and babbling incessantly to until I realized he wasn’t even listening. But I thank him a great amount for being there to help me out and lift me up when I hit rough patches.”
Elsie’s (Liz’s) big break came in 1900, when Elsie was 11. It so happened that she had known President McKinley from his days as Ohio governor. Based on this old connection, Elsie was booked for a “command performance” at the White House. Following that engagement, she was truly in demand. At Mike Shea’s Theatre in Buffalo, she started out in the number two slot. By the following week she was headlining. Her 1905 performance at New York’s Casino Theatre Roof Garden set the town abuzz, with her impressions of Weber and Fields, Faye Templeton and Lillian Russell. later that year she played London and Paris. Her repertoire grew over the years to include: Vesta Victoria, Eddie Foy, Eva Tanguay, Ethyl Barrymore, Anna Held, Harry Lauder, Irene Franklin, Pat Rooney, Frank Tinny, George M. Cohan, Sarah Bernhardt, Nazimova, Bert Williams, Fanny Brice, Will Rogers—effectively half the people in these annals.
Tv( Shutter Speed ) 0.5
"I have a better idea," she replied. "Just for tonight, let's pretend that we're married."
Thats all for now ...talk to you all soon!
ready? no staged reveal this time, friends. no tweaking the color, shrinking the shadows, no background of beat up blue doors from my hoarder.
Marley shrugged.
TOTAL SPENT (excluding hotel n flight):
“One day a young man came in and bought a book about a French actor. He was scruffy and very Bohemian-looking. I thought he was a poet on his uppers, so I gave him a discount. Someone later told me he was Colin Farrell.”
Tonight I am kvelling, and I don't know why.
I have just received the best email notification ever, telling me that I am a finalist in the Fiction category of this year's Aesthetica Creative Works Competition, out of 4000 entries. The winner will be announced on December 01, so everybody keep their fingers crossed.
May 3- 90-Day Mailing
As I waited to order, this man came up to the driver’s side of my car and asking me to spare $3 so he could get some food. I placed my hand over the $5 bill sitting in my lap and told him I didn’t have any change. What about $2? $1? I shook my head and told him I was paying with a card. He walked away dejected.
"To really like is to obtain a look of paradise." - Nancy Sunde
I felt like I was getting ready for the first day of school buying a composition book, a mixed media journal, a bristol pad, a new watercolour pad AND checking out all of the pen possibilities! Can you believe I have just bought my very first Copic? Lesson 5 was an exercise for our Loving Letters journals! So many of you do outstanding art journals, so just roll your eyes (privately of course LOL) at my attempts and know that I will likely get better LOL
Summer Vacation and Your Pond
I swear that vase has almost 2 gallons of water in it.
1 x Cadbury World thimball, Flake pen, Cadbury fridge magnet, keyring, leather bookmark and enamel pin badge.
gathering all of it? I know after Andrew wandered into
The best presidents –in fact, I’d say most, to a greater or lesser degree– have a sense of history, that they are only the custodians of an office and a tradition. They have healthy egos, but even those with the (heretofore) biggest, such as LBJ, know they stand in the shadows of the men who came before.
As any frequent reader of my work would likely suspect, my reaction to this news is generally positive. Admission fees and affordability at museums has been an axe I like to grind, and this is a big step in the right direction. The adult admission fee has dropped by a third, and is finally almost in that movie-ticket ballpark I’ve recommended as a maximum in the past.
He added: "If David don't fight me, I am going to physically burn him."
We finished with a Bonta Gorgonzola dolce latte cheese paired with the Surefoot Stout. A fitting finish as it showed that a few quiet beers beforehand with the brewer and chat about what flavours and characteristics dominate the brew and a good chef will come up with a winner everytime. I don’t know exactly how many ales the kitchen crew shared with Dave but my guess would be “just the right number”.
There you are, thinking that your life is in place, perhaps boring, perhaps staid, but fairly settled, and then suddenly shit starts popping all around you, all at once, all stuff you desperately want, or things that are challenging, and your stomach is tense and you can't take a deep breath because it's all rather freaking exciting and why couldn't all this stuff have spread itself over some time instead of happening at once?
For me, it’s all—it’s just all—these things are all just prose experiments. I get to show up somewhere, and I don’t care where I’m doing it, and they’re paying me to do it. Ridiculous! I feel like—this may be pretentous—do you know the book Giacometti Portrait by James Lord?
On average, our basic food costs have increased by an incredible 48% over the last year (measured by wheat, corn, oats, and canola prices). From the price at the pump to heating your stove, energy costs are up 23% on average (heating oil, gasoline, natural gas). A little protein at dinner is now 39% higher (beef and pork), and your morning cup of coffee with a little sugar has risen by 36% since last October.
Great question! A variation of this titling issue happens to a lot of people--you know, having the perfect title for your book and then realizing there are a host of outside circumstances working against your using that perfect title.
In the Middle third, the protagonist travels to her Guru’s Ashram in India and spends her time there mostly in meditation. When she is in scene in this section, it is often with Richard from Texas who is a hoot and a compassionate mentor.
“One mother told me when she went with her 18 month son to his medical checkup, and he was not in daycare. They said, ‘Oh, your son is not in daycare? But he has to go to daycare. He needs that and you need to work,’”Himmselstrand told CBN News.
Starts stops jolts systems
I use more sugar than the original recipe in the biscuit recipe.
hot (an essential when you have a woodstove)
It’s a catch-22: we want Callahan to do what he does to people like Scorpio, indeed we can even justify it, but we also want the court system to reprimand cops for disregarding the cases of Miranda and Escobido. The film is wise to drop those names in the scene that follows the one from the football field where, once again, gets the audience firmly behind the anti-hero Callahan as he vents his frustrations at the bureaucratic ridiculousness of City Hall as the mayor claims that Scorpio, once out of the hospital, will walk a free man because his rights were taken from him. Callahan, through clenched teeth (of course), asks the mayor about the kidnapped girl’s rights. It ultimately culminates in the mayor letting Harry know that the gun used as the murder weapon in all of the rooftop sniper killings is inadmissible as evidence because, “it’s the law.” Harry response of, “Well then the law’s crazy!” is a scene that no doubt elicited a lot of head-nodding and “amens” from everyone who watched it in 1971, a time of great tension and tumultuousness (and would probably get the same reaction were it shown in theaters today); yet, the individual that critically thinks about the situation clearly understands that Harry was in the wrong even though Scorpio is the bad guy. I think what makes Dirty Harry so effective and popular even today is the way the mood of politically correct America in the 2000s can still be applied to a film that was made in 1971 and was about the mood of America in the ‘60s.
Everyone is always highly surprised... and politely determined to let nothing shake their faith in the evil powers of the demon drink. It's like trying to explain teh causes of rain to some remote mud-hut tribe in thrall to the magic of witch-doctors and rain-makers.
Quote: Some succeed because they are destined. Some succeed because they are determined.
But Hannah is independent and willful, and Seth is equally so. Plus Simon doesn’t want his brother to have anything to do with this vexing widow. Is it possible for Hannah and Seth to move past their difficulties and find a lasting love?
Famous for its horses and prized Aberdeen Angus cattle, Gigginstown House Stud, near Mullingar, Co Westmeath, is the residence of Michael O’Leary, chief executive of Ryanair. O’Leary was born in Mullingar on March 20, 1961 and educated at Clongowes Wood College in County Kildare before reading business studies at Trinity College Dublin. After graduating in 1983, O’Leary began working as an accountant for SKG as well as setting up a chain of newsagents. While working at SKG, he advised Tony Ryan, head of Guinness Peat Aviation and father of O’Leary’s school friend Declan. He rose to become Ryan’s financial advisor in 1987 and was given the task of turning round his failing budget airline, Ryanair, becoming deputy chief executive in 1991 and chief executive in 1994. O’Leary modelled Ryanair on the no-frills US operator Southwest Airlines. The airline benefited from the EU’s deregulation of the air industry in 1992 and has grown to become one of Europe’s largest carriers, carrying 67 million passengers a year.He was valued at £338 million in the 2011 Sunday Times Rich List. O’Leary started off with horses on the Flat with David Wachman and Mick Halford, but he has rapidly become a jump owner with a string only rivalled by J P McManus. His team of over 100 horses is split between a wide range of trainers in Ireland and his racing enthusiasm was kick-started when one of his first horses, War Of Attrition, won the 2006 Cheltenham Gold Cup. His seven Cheltenham Festival winners include Weapon’s Amnesty in the 2009
the next couple of months. I’ll also be at Fandom Fest in Louisville at the end of June promoting my work and speaking on different panels; in the meantime readers can check out my blog for the convention’s zine Fandom Scene.
They believed me.
I mentioned awhile back that a couple weekends ago, my husband had to work more than 30 hours between 6 p.m. Friday and noon on Sunday. It was extremely uncool. When his project was finally over on Sunday afternoon, I decided to be extra nice by doing something I almost never do – picking up some scotch and grilling him a big, fat steak. Scotch and steak are not exactly two of my favorite things, but it was a nice treat for him, and this yummy marinade went a long way toward making me enjoy my steak.
I cringe just writing it. And even more so when I hear it. When I hear people use that word so carelessly without even thinking I want to hold my children in front of their faces and scream, “really?!”
The winds swirled dust and bits of glass into my eyes, compelling me to the opening. The Citadel called, and though I hesitated, I knew I would have to crawl forward.
decked out her adorable little hedgehog for Christmas...
Here the sun still lingers close to the horizon and it will be an hour before the moon
Kim left us on December 9, 2008. I think of her every day, with love and admiration.
Igleheart Brothers, Evansville, Ind."
Weigh-in! Ali announces that the rowing challenge winner is Chism! By a mere 7 seconds over Kim. I like Chism, he deserves the $10K. Here are the weigh-in results, remember that if they lose 5% of their body weight they get immunity:
Daddy?" I scratch out a couple
I am very disheartened by what I saw on Sunday.
Initially we were just going to use S's crib for the baby, but we've been finding out all kinds of horrible things about engineered wood and off-gassing and the long-term health effects it can have on babies, so we decided that it wasn't worth the risk and have forked out some big ones for this solid birch, not-made-in-China beauty. I just wish we'd known about it when S was born! Or before I upholstered the bed for his big boy room and used plywood to extend the headboard. Now I have to go back and replace it with real wood, which will be a bit of a faff. He's not moving in there for another couple of months though, so I'll worry about that later.
If this river flowing will ever dry ???
Some outfits are Zipping
So, coming through security in a very long queue, and I'm waiting for my bag to come through the weird bit where everything seems to disappear for longer than it should. It's some kind of vortex in there, don't you think? And I'm standing in my pink socks (because I'd forgotten that I'd have to take my boots off and reveal that I was wearing more than black tights. Obviously, I was wearing more than black tights but you know what I mean.) And I'm wondering why four security people are leaning over the computer screen and pointing and turning their heads onto their sides and Looking Concerned and calling more people over. Then a man comes up to me, pleasantly enough, and says:
Row 15- (sc in 4sc, 2sc in next) around (60) Mark this row
This is my first award and I have learnt from his post that there are certain rules and norms, I have to follow after getting the award..
The butterfly die is Stampin Up Beautiful Butterflies and the little flowers are the Itty Bitty punches. Sentiment, again is Pink Petticoat;
This recipe isn’t really challenging at all, which is perfect for people like me who fall to pieces when their culinary creations fall to pieces. You can roast the onions with the squash, boil the carrots with the stock cube and seasoning and then all you have left to do is to combine each of them in one pot. Remember to spoon the now tender squash out of its skin to avoid giving any one of your loved ones a nasty case of indigestion. Then you blend all together until the texture is to your pleasing.
But my favourite aspect of The Midnight Club is the romance between Ilonka and fellow club member Kevin. Made all the more poignant by the fact that Pike's real name is Kevin, it's a story of a love that may be doomed and short-lived... or may be destined to last forever.
I don't want to be attacked for something I love. I give everything I have to my students and then some. It hurts to hear the things people are saying. I am sorry that the course work for educators is not as difficult as other majors. That doesn't mean that I didn't study and work hard during college. I went to class, participated, read the material, studied, wrote papers, completed projects, went to schools, completed my student teaching and graduated with a 4.00. That doesn't matter now, but I am still proud of it. It enrages me to hear people scoff at my college degree like I didn't work for it or like I am not paying for it through student loans.
In all the innumerable brothels, on all the dingy street-corners, in all the knocking-shops that went – Hyacinth-Bucket-style – by the term ‘Escort Agencies’ there was an absolute dearth of these ‘Happy Hookers’. So, if I didn’t already know the answer, my question would be: where were you all hiding?
4) That the poet should always have something to say. A poem is not a message, though it may contain a message if the poet chooses or if the poem arrives at one. Poetry can be as much about discovery as about, say, the poet telling us of an experience that has already happened.
Abdul Malik Mujahid
It's Albarn and Hewlett's second collaboration with the newly-created Manchester International Festival. In November 2005, they staged the first-ever live performances of Demon Days Live involving many of the artists who had played on the successful Demon Days album, as a launch event for the festival.
The hero, well he has issues, he had stutter as a kid and the relationship with his dad was horrible. He is carrying a lot of anger. Even though we know that this well end up in a HEA there are obstacles first as he never wants to marry or have kids. Poor guy is pretty messed up.
But if, baby, I’m the bottom,
I'm afraid it's only the front cover on show today, as I only had time for a quick photo before work, but I will definitely take photo's of it all and post in the next WOYWW for anyone who wants a peek inside, it's filled with old photo's, some nice verses and sentiments. All I need to do now is make a box for it and add the little tag I have made which I will do over the next couple of days. I will also be tidying up the huge mess that has been created throughout the completion of the book! My desk is an absolute tip and I cannot wait to tidy it up, I know getting crafty creates a mess but I'm at that stage where I can't find anything!!!!
Sculpture can be made of many different materials.
I was very disappointed at the pigmentation of the Balm, it's basically clear lip gloss, and for $7 USD is very expensive. Also another thing that bothered me is the greasiness of it, it doesn't feel waxy like balm but greasy like oil on your lips. On the other hand the lip butters are very creamy and very light, but they don't really moisturize your lips. It is basically lipstick and not a tinted lipbalm.
Scarf, used as a belt - Salvation Army
Thank You for the gifts and abilities that You have given me. Help me to step out in faith and to use those gifts to bless others and to bring You glory. Teach me to be available to Your call and the direction of the Holy Spirit. Use me today to reach others for eternity. In Jesus’ name, Amen.
It's been a rough year. Hell, it's been a rough few years. And probably a few more ahead. My possessions, my daughter, my pets, my parents... all these will get left behind. You know things are bad when you have to go back to the Old Country for a new start.
(sigh) "Fine, what sort of sponge? Seeing as you 3 are simply lying on the grass does someone want to come with and run in?"
At one time he had people who loved him, he had friends, he had a job, he had a boyfriend/girlfriend, a home, some hobbies, and a future.
The person being left will always have a much harder time understanding why things happen the way they do. It doesn’t mean you’re wrong, it simply means that it wasn’t for you, when you’re able to understand that, you will be able to understand why things happen. We’re creatures of habit, we get attached to people, things and sometimes it’s hard letting go. Take my baby niece for example, she’s attached to her blanket, she won’t let it go even though it’s old and ready to go out to the garbage can. Sometimes breakups can be seen that way. We know it’s over but we can’t let it go, somehow it becomes an addiction we seek, we understand it’s not good for our heart but yet we try to meet out needs. There’s some psychological term for this, one of my buddies is a PHD student, whenever I need someone to give me these terms, I call her up. This friend knows her material and I’m certain a successful career in marriage and relationship counseling awaits her.
starting to calm down and feel better.
Christy
We were lucky to have a brilliant guide for the two weeks; Mamadou W Jallow.With his fantastic knowledge of birds, bird calls and all other wildlife of the Gambia, Mamadou made the two weeks even better. So on the 14/04/2012, Mamadou came to the Forest Park with us and pointed out many birds species, telling us information about them, ensuring we got a good glimpse of them and had the opportunity to photograph them.
She turned on the TV and flipped through the channels. She found one of David's movies. Get it out of Me.... a really bad horror movie. It had received horrible reviews, and the movie deserved horrible reviews. Rachel could admit that. But she still loved it, simply because David was in it.
Oct 17 – The Eagles Club – Milwaukee, WI (W/Cobra Starship)
I worked on both projects this month, but in the end, I really didn't like the Runway of Pearls so I took it apart to salvage my embellishment beads. I still have the RAW base of matte black size 11/0 triangle beads...maybe I will do something else with that in the future, but for now it sits in a plastic baggie in my box of samples!
Since this blog is about sharing those little Eureka moments, I am going to let you in on a little mental breakthrough I had last night.
Preschool will provide the ice cream, drinks and table service. Families are encouraged to bring a ice cream topping to share.
Hey, it's not me. The polls said it.
4. Wednesday frightens.
For the fastest wireless Internet experience, you have to go to Android. That’s because–for now–only Android devices support true 4G LTE networking, the wireless data standard that is succeeding, and outspeeding, 3G.
3. Switch to the dough hook and knead on low speed for about 10 minutes. When the dough is ready it will have a satiny finish, but it will still be somewhat wet and will cling to the dough hook (if still too wet and sticky, you can add slightly more flour to the dough, a tablespoon at a time).*
I have been waiting—oh, I have been waiting—to post the cover of YOU ARE MY ONLY, which is due out from Laura Geringer Books/Egmont USA this fall. Neil Swaab, who set me dancing with his DANGEROUS NEIGHBORS cover, was brought on board once again. This is the magnificent result of his fine eye and heart.
Pour this ground mixture to the pan with little water.
Bosnia and Herzegovina then stole my heart from Finland, primarily because one of their members spent the first half of the song skipping around the stage. I love skipping; it's so carefree, just like Bosnia.
2. Place washed rice in a heavy-bottomed pot with a capacity of about 5 litres. Coat grains with the sesame oil. Add the stock (or water), salt, chicken and ginger.
Lamp reflectors
So after buying a house and spending time making it our own, we (my partner and I) thought we should spend some time on the yard. So how do you ‘green’ suburbia? Slowly we got rid of some of our lawn, planted perennials and built, drum roll please...raised vegetable beds! For me, it felt like a revolution was happening in my own backyard. I felt empowered and I was really going to stick it to the proverbial ‘man’. However, that first year, the vegetable garden wasn’t quite the picture of success we had imagined (we really didn’t know what we were doing), though we did harvest tomatoes, beans and lots of various lettuces. In subsequent years, we varied the types of seeds we sowed and focused mainly on heirloom and organic ones. Thankfully, our harvest has been slightly better every year since.
Level 15: Weapon ATT: +15, Accuracy: +5%, Proc Rate: 53%, Deals 205% damage 2 times.
Where is this location ? Some say its a hotel..
Undervaluing yourself and a lack of knowledge in what the market is can have some dire effects not just for you but any other freelancers in the area. Often freelancers are living a very hand to mouth existence. If there was good money in this job everyone would do it. But the simple fact is that often the work is undervalued and thus underpaid. Only those with a strong network and high value, sic high paying, clients do well for themselves. They are never beginners though and well established.
In between each pair of the 6 Bagatelles by György Ligeti , the quartet played pieces of other composers. The first of the 6 Bagatelles, “allegro conspirito”, was a promising and spirited enough start of the concert. Nr 2, the “Rubato – Lamentoso”, was less so. It was followed by what to me was the most disappointed piece of the concert: a rendering of Astor Piazzolla’s “Histoire du Tango; nr 2, Café”.
d) mothers approve
Like Sorescu, Chase can be wry and yet wrangle humour from the situation as an imagined market survey in ‘Ticks and Kisses’ shows:
The last four weeks have been so crazy-exhausting-exciting-exhausting. But you wouldn't know about that, would you? Because I've been neglecting this blog again, haven't I?
Requirements & Restrictions
Individual amino acids, such as lysine which has been claimed to prevent herpes is not true. It is also not safe to use for any herpes related infection, as scientific evidence is lacking. Tryptophan, another amino acid has been advertised to relieve pain, depression and insomnia. Tryptophan is directly related to serotonin which is an important regulator of sleep, appetite and sensory perception. High doses of tryptophan can induce sleepiness bur also include unpleasant side effects.
GRADBALL DRESSES
That’s exactly what happened to the New Age movement, which started out as an intriguing attempt to find common ground between cutting edge sciences, traditional wisdom, and the experiences of contemporary visionaries, before it got mugged by the marketers in the dark alleys of the early 1980s. For heaven’s sake, Gregory Bateson used to count as a New Age thinker. What he would have thought of today’s New Age scene—well, let’s just say that if he suddenly stepped out of a shack at Esalen this evening with an ax in his hand, I’m not sure how confident I would be that he had firewood in mind.
Dalmas's half-brother Austin has declared himself King and placed a price on Dalmas's head. If Dalmas hopes to take back his rightful Crown, he must find documents that prove Austin's claims false before his own Castle Guards catch up with him.
The usual mix of the deep f*cking greencovered corporations and their fecal brownfaced NGOs are at it again. This time they have come up with a deep green branding campaign (what no Saatchi and Saatchi?) called FORTUNE’s first-ever Brainstorm: GREEN Conference.”
“It’s like it happened yesterday for you, I know,” he interrupted. “And now, after what you just told me, I understand even more why you disappeared after the murder. But why didn’t you tell this to someone during the investigation?”
I didn’t come and talk to you, ‘cause that’s never worked before
Ryan Sims
“Though I love her—that, he comprehends—
The Roman legions were divisions in the army (unless you're a lazy fuck; if that's the case, you simply refer to the entire Roman army as "the legion"), usually varying in size, but they could be up to 6000 men. They were usually comprised of Roman citizens, but occasionally there would be men from outside the Roman state fighting in the legions in hopes that Roman citizenship would be granted to them and their families should they survive long enough to retire honorably. Wait, that sounds familiar...
Paola
Hmm, can anybody count or more than one hand how many they recognise?!
-Full fixings for French dip sandwiches
Henry Ford and Thomas Edison were friends who spent their winters vacationing right next to one another, and I got to tour their homes while I was there.
This film brought home to me the fact that there are so many other Sorayas and potential Sorayas out there. Maybe one of them is facing the same fate even as I write. Islamic Sharia is still being practised in many states and many communities still believe adultery is punishable by stoning. Despite governments’ denial that death by stoning is still being meted out as a punishment the reality is that it is happening. Stories from Iran, Afghanistan, Somalia, Iraq recording incidences of stoning have been reported.
I hate you because you desecrate our graves.
A guy with a haircut reminding that of Mr. Spock from Star Trek asked me if that would be all right if they featured my girlfriend in a new video from Bernstein. Mr. Spock said in the video she would be tied to a wall, being whipped by a guy dressed like a demon.
“I’m not upset, Mum,” she said. “It’s not like Rocky was a cat.”
HOW TO ENTER THE GIVEAWAY: Contest period runs from Wednesday, August 24, 2011 at 11:01 PM (Pacific) until Wednesday, September 7, 2011 at 11:59 PM (Pacific). All you have to do is follow my blog with Google Friend Connect by clicking on the sidebar (it counts if you are already a friend) and then leave a comment stating which of the prizes you would like to win. I reserve the right to add prizes and extend the contest period. At the end of the contest period, I will utilize Random.org to randomly choose the winner order. Everyone will be contacted by e-mail and will have 72 hours to respond to my e-mail with their prize preference order. This contest is open for US Residents Only as I am mailing these prizes out myself. Thank you to the generous sponsors!
This week I watched the rescue of the Chilean mine workers. Needless to say, it so amazing they all survived. I can't imagine being trapped for almost 70 days underground!! That's a really long time!
Which is where May comes in. It’s Clean Eating May! One of the spouses on base is a Beachbody coach, whatever that means, and has challenged anyone who will take her up on it to make this month Clean Eating May. Which means?
The critic, it follows, must never set him- or herself up as some kind of infallible oracle. The relationship between critic and reader must always be one of debate. One might invoke here F. R. Leavis's famous definition of the ideal critical exchange: "This is so, isn't it?" / "Yes, but..." All interesting criticism is founded in the critic's beliefs and values, political position, background, influences, and these should be made explicit or so clearly implied as to leave no room for ambiguity. The theorist and scholar can (up to a point) conceal any personal commitment behind a cloak of objectivity. The personal element will always be there (in such matters as choice of material to be pursued and analyzed, choice of premise from which to work), but it can only be exposed with precisely that "reading between the lines" that the apparent perfect objectivity is there to deflect.
Often people are too lazy to optimize e.g. their electricity provider, because the hassle involved seems to be big (compare offers, find a better one, cancel the old contract, set up a new one) and the reward seems to be small, e.g. a couple of Euros per month only.
Speaking of, my uncle who passed away from fucking cancer A YEAR AND A HALF ago STILL doesn't have a fucking headstone on his grave. What the disrespectful FUCK, y'all?! I'm not sure why this pisses me off so much, but it does. And it confirms, yet again, that I have no desire to be buried in a graveyard. The whole exercise is weird and creepy to me (as if death weren't weird and creepy enough).
I was so relieved over the weekend that Hurricane Irene didn't cause too much damage to NYC. I just couldn't have handled anymore bad images of a place that holds such a huge chunk of my heart.
Now, I will admit that my solvency is not threatened by ReAssure’s tardiness and Barclays Life’s miserable performance. But for lots of people, much less equipped than I am to extract revenge, such payments are of vital importance. These institutions are brutes run by brutes, each one as bad as the other.
Top (under): Thrifted ($2 ish?)
She had listened to him, paying dutiful attention to the swan which had actually drifted up to them by the bank, dipping its beak and then curving to probe irritably into the snowy tuft of feathers on its breast; but she was thinking less of the swan than of the young whiskers on Henry's cheek, only her thoughts had merged, so that she wondered whether Henry's brown curls were as soft as the feathers on the breast of the swan, and all but reached out an idle hand to feel them. Then he passed from the swan, as though that had been but a gambit to cover his hesitation, and the next thing she knew was that he was speaking earnestly, bending forward and even fingering a flounce of her dress, as though anxious, although unaware of his anxiety, to establish some kind of contact between himself and her; but for her all true contact had been severed from the moment he began to speak so earnestly...He had gone. He had left her. Even while she conscientiously gazed at him and listened, she was already miles and miles away. He had passed into the sphere where people marry, beget and bear children, bring them up, give orders to servants...Mr. Holland was asking her to accompany him into this sphere. He was asking her to be his wife."
We call on newly elected Governor Andrew Cuomo to increase funding for veterans' service agencies and help returning citizen-soldiers from Iraq and Afghanistan to reclaim homes lost to foreclosures while they were deployed and enact legislation to halt such losses in the future.
Game- Introduce game: What was on the ark with Noah and his family? Can you find what animal is missing from the ark?
Interfacing (optional)
Local analysts in the wake of the most recent attack in Kabul stated that this was a likely occurrence, and that the tried-and-true approach of holing up in a building that’s under construction and launching RPGs probably wouldn’t be repeated.
connected in a unique way
Poacher's Choice - (Strong ale)
To save them both, Fintan must convince Beth to believe in herself and her ability to overpower his unholy sire. If he fails, he will remain an eternal slave to his tainted blood and lose Beth forever.
I could tell you sponsorship and pro-bono horror stories all day long. I worked over 100 hours raising money for an organizations in the past, and today, they pretend not to know me. You can probably guess how that makes me feel. You can probably also guess why I have stopped conversing with them, and I don't attend their events. For another group, I invested $400 out of my pocket to keep their club afloat. When I was a teaching assistant in grad school, $400 was almost half of my monthly stipend. The response I got was "we didn't care about you anyways." I don't even pay dues to them anymore, and I've been approached numerous times about why I left the group. It doesn't take a psychologist to guess how I feel about them now. I have no sympathy for groups who behave in such rude ways.
The zombies came out of the water and started tearing up the town. By tearing up the town, of course, I mean gingerly pushing chairs over at the local watering hole. I should mention that in this montage of zombie action (I use that term loosely) we see many more pairs of French breasts. Starkwell definitely has one foot out the door. The novelty of this film wore off of Lovelock about ten boobies ago. Considering how they just rose from the water in those thick army jackets, “they all look remarkably dry”, noted Starkwell. The villagers form a posse to take out the Nazi zombies.
Encouraging Comfort Care was made possible through a generous grant from the Retirement Research Foundation to the Alzheimer’s Association-Greater Illinois Chapter.
They’re PUBLIC: Great sketchnotes create a “map” of the presentation that provides a visual summary for others to read and explore. More and more sketchnotes are shared online, giving people views into both the content that was being presented, as well as the point-of-view of the sketchnoter.
I am very grateful for this because he both put us on track, as well as pushes us a bit further in the training.
Blitz could and should have been a lot better, but is still worth screening.
How did she even get away with it at the time? Prostitution is an express elevator to rehab — and worse.
Tomorrow if the weather holds up, and being Queensland it’s apparently sunny one day and beautiful the next.
We came back and it was a half hour till closing and the line was just as long. But then a friend invited me to cut. I was then brimming with cool kid satisfaction. It didn’t matter though, because everything was gone when we made it in. I found a “Dirty Found” postcard, and that was about it. I think I’m kind of glad I didn’t walk away with a bunch of free stuff because I never through anything away. I have tons and tons of art magazines. Quality publications like ARTFORUM and Modern Painters are just too damn nice and expensive to pitch. And all those essays you are going to read one day!
Too many memories to surmise the unknown.
(On a side note, “civilians” always ask me what the difference between an attorney and a lawyer is — none really in the US, it’s kinda like the difference between physician and doctor, semantics really. In the UK and other places, there is a stark difference between solicitors (lawyers who interact with clients and do transactional work) and barristers (the wig wearers who are allowed into courts and actually do trials).)
Platform: PC via Steam or the main website.
3-5 years of experience required
In the weeks while I was writing this book, I was bitten by a cat and, luckily for me, the cat was wearing a collar and ID tag with the owner’s phone number, so I was able to contact the owner and determine whether the cat had had a rabies vaccine. This is only one of several reasons for your cat to wear an ID tag, but the most obvious reason is that if your cat wanders off too far or is injured or, heaven forbid, ends up in an animal shelter, someone will be able to contact you.
All of a sudden I realised my pot of beautiful Hippeastrum plants looked like a plague of phytophthera had hit it…the leaves were like mush and wilted and in short the whole thing looked on the brink of death. Porridge forgotten I shot into the pool area to see what was going on. As I pulled one leaf after another from the plant, landing mush-like on the ground I had images of my Irish ancestors checking each potato tuber after the Blight had infected their food source. At least I was only obsessing about some flowers, not my food and sustenance. But I wasn’t happy!
Special case: Skirmishers
As a teenager, Sahm joined a band that performed blues music, mostly at black R&B clubs in San Antonio. He also got to know a number of Mexican-American musicians.
Crate Paper Farmhouse Collection Border Stickers
Failure to communicate
Can voters see the holes in the rhetoric ?
He stops and looks around, blinking his eyes. Every wall, the floor, even the ceiling, is covered in plastic sheeting. Stapled to the moulding and the skirting board, pinned to the Artex. The room has a single furnishing. A mattress, under more plastic, an elegant and expensive set of chef’s knives laying on it in an open case.
Stephanopoulos: Larry is this job growth for real?
Now Mayweather and Cotto will meet in what some believe could be where Mayweather could get knocked off his Undefeated crown. I have confidence that if Mayweather starts to take his opponenst lightly like he has been lately, then I could see Miguel Cotto pulling off the upset. Let’s be honest with ourselves though, it’s highly unlikely to happen.
On the subject - A seasonal beer in cask form, Badger have taken this ale from very humble beginnings in a tiny brew pub and made it one of the best selling bottled beers in Britain.
I wanted to rest there,
Marie and the B team
For my money Phil hasn't done enough lately, but that makes jewels like this even that much more special when you come across them.
The Patterson’s were blessed with one child, a daughter. Casey Ann was born on February 2nd. This event thrilled Clinton and automactiv=cally called her, his little groundhog. When she was young, she loved the nickname her father so lovingly gave her. However, as she got older, the cuteness wore off. As Casey grew, she became a charming young lady with great promise of a wonderful life. She had a sweet personality, kind to everyone she met. Blessed with lots of family and friends. Casey had one very special admirer. This fine, upstanding young man was Casey’s next-door neighbor, Pascal Pete Rutherford.
Michael Cammarata, 22, Huguenot, N.Y.
An Act appropriating the sum of five million pesos to enable the national housing commission to resume its functions” (Approved, November 1, 1945.)
Now that we were done, we all decided to go have some Pizza before calling it a night. It was late, but we knew a local Pizza Place that was open and headed in that direction as we laughed and carried on. Then in an instant, in the darkness of the night, our lives were changed and nearly over. We were struck by an oncoming vehicle and I can only relay these details as they were told to me since it was the passenger side right behind me that was impacted and I was knocked out cold. The car was totaled and a bloody mess, I was hit in the head and the fellow behind me had nearly every bone broken... a phone call was made to my mother that night telling her that if she didn't rush to the hospital I might not make it. Can you imagine how that would be if it were your child? I totally lost about 3 weeks of my life as I do not remember anything at all until one day when I just "woke up". The other passengers had whiplash, cuts, bruises and I am not really sure what else, but the two of us on the passenger side had the worst of the injuries. In fact, I was picking glass out of my head for the next year!!
If you feel your kids are missing out on Christmas, maybe they're really missing out on religion. Religion isn't just about being anti-commercial and not having any fun. Maybe that worked for our Puritan forebears here in New England, but it's not especially Jewish, and it's definitely not the way to get your kids turned on. A big part of Judaism is finding joy and celebration in life. Jews invented dreidels, after all--we're not against giving kids toys! As parents, we don't want to spoil our kids all year, but we want to buy them things sometimes. So, they get Hanukkah presents. Better that they should hear "you're so lucky you get eight nights of presents" than think they're unlucky not to get one visit from Santa.
"Along the fault zone, in the region of the St. Elias earthquake, pressure from the Pacific plate sliding under the continental plate had built up since 1899 when previous earthquakes occurred. Between 1899 and 1979, many glaciers near the fault zone thinned by hundreds of meters and some completely disappeared. Photographs of these glaciers, many taken by Molnia during the last 30 years, were used to identify details within areas of greatest ice loss."
We’re gonna catch a big one!
“Please sir, I have
Reed and Gerry down at the music. I think this is from Thursday night. This evening, Reed really wanted to go home early. We hadn't quite gotten into the groove of going down for the music yet, so we had forgotten to bring toys, snacks and jammies for him. I was torn. Part of me feared that if we went back early that night, that he'd want to go back early every night and I knew that neither G nor I was going to be excited to miss the music for the next few nights. But I also worried that if I made him stay, it would take all the fun out of it and he wouldn't want to come to the music any more. But when I stopped and considered how unprepared we were, I decided to go back to camp. It turned out fine and we stayed for all the music after that!
We also have a selection of Enriched eBooks, which use word games, story interactions, and animation to deeply draw your young reader in, further developing comprehension and critical thinking skills.
Doppelbock: Rich, sweet, malty, meant for meat. You haven’t lived until you’ve enjoyed Bavarian-style pork knuckle with Doppelbock.
He pulls Robin toward him, caressing her as she pulls herself away.
Is history repeating itself? At the tower of Babel they rejected the Word of God. In Romans 1:25, “They changed the truth of God into a lie.” The Jews were doing this by seeking the life of the apostle Paul. They were making the cross of Christ of no effect. Of course it is of no effect to those who reject it. Rather it becomes a form of condemnation.
I can’t wait to see your shiny cards! Happy crafting!
She had a frantic-ness about her. From my hideout I could hear her say "it's too green...and this one's too orange. I want taupe. Mix me taupe. You know, kind of pink and tan. That's what taupe is, right? A sandy, beachy color?"
in one single being as living as life;
Anyway, if you have a Cryptic account and have had it prior to December 2010, you need to go over there and reset your passwords there NOW. And if you made the mistake of using the same password across multiple platforms, I’d reset THOSE too-and make them different from each other. Cryptic’s screwed you over already once with this issue-no sense in allowing that error to be compounded.
I believe the reason I ran into margin issues is that you can no longer buy gold on margin. A few months ago it was posted that Gold would no longer be available for trading via Forex. I was ticked off, and then the date passed, and Gold was still available on my account. So I didn’t really look into it, figuring that the article was overblown or inaccurate or something. In the meantime price shot up and I waited all this time for it to fall. I finally had gold meet my target price and I bought and it executed, so I didn’t think much about it.
Anyway, Phil got in touch, which made me happy and we filled each other in on our lives and I tried to imagine Phil as a father, as the last time I saw him he and I were about 22 but now he's got a fine boy. Phil then started talking about his mate who is an autograph hunter and then Phil said:
A tangled web indeed.
So, tell you what. I'll take your moral objections as to how voluntary contributions are invested seriously, the day you tell ASH (for starters) to give the hundreds of thousands of pounds of taxpayers' money - taken by force - back to the exchequor. Till then, shut the fuck up.
Does that have anything to do with this gold thing you are talking about?
Well, i'm not the owner for nothin'! So I added it! HAHAHAHAHAHAHAA!
We could consider more cases. There’s the photograph of a photograph of a beautiful view out of a window in Studio Window, 2008. We are thoroughly removed from that lovely window -- the window holds little reality for us. The reality is instead that the mechanical, cold image does its work and its work is troubling. Furthermore, the installation of the photograph in a gallery brings a double alienating effect, one more removal. Then there is Guilt (p. 107), 2008, where Collier has photographed what is probably one of many, many pages where we can write what we are guilty of – the horror of those brackets “(p.107)” – we are trapped in the mechanical image, we are trapped in ourselves, humanity is distant. The most sobering of all of Collier’s photos are her eye photos, where the human eye is surrounded by a white border and placed on a pile of photos in a box of photo paper. What is implied is that each eye in the lens is like every other eye in every other lens and this can be repeated into infinity.
of 94,607 priests for the period 1960-2002. When we look at the time
Abundance comes in many forms. You can easily work this spell to work for Financial Prosperity & Abundance; Abundance of Love or Friendship; Abundance & Success in Your Career; An Abundance Of Harmony in your Life & Home; An Abundance of Good Fortune for You & Your Family; the list is nearly endless. *
03 Aquarius
we had such dreams, that i could be
The notion that all religion is bad is a false assumption based on negative experience. We don’t want to give people a bad taste in their mouth so we deceptively present Christianity as if there are no restrictions attached. “All you have to do is admit that you’re a sinner and accept Jesus into your heart.” Once they have fallen for the bate and switch, they get into the mess that is Christianity and find that there are a lot of disagreements on how they ought to live after they are saved. Presenting the notion that we can kneel at the cross for salvation without taking up our own in sanctification is a classical trick which leaves the Church with a lot of Christians who only have one foot in the door.
Dedicated to inclusiveness, both the Montreal and Victoria Y’s offer membership assistance to those unable to pay full membership fees. It means that anybody can join the Y and benefit from its services and facilities. It means if you’re out of work, you can at the very least get healthy and stay healthy by using the sports centre, and stay connected with your community by participating in Y events.
It feels like hamsters in these dreams have become the old Kenny death joke from South Park! I always wake up feeling horrible at first, but then relieved I didn't actually do any of these things. But holy crap, does it make me fearful of ever taking care of a small rodent!
Ace is a cool guy. I always liked him and I think he's a great vocalist for this style. Lot's of rasp instead of just growl. I can understand most of what he's singing as well. Glen the guitar player always seemed nice enough but whenever he talked to me it seemed like he was forcing himself to concentrate on what I was saying. Meanwhile he seemed to understand other people just fine. Whatever. He was later a mainstay at the drum circle at Sunset park. No surprise there. Even later he started a hippie jam band called the Baccanaul.
I sliced up some onions, grated the mozarella cheese, chopped up some leftover chicken into small pieces and set aside half jar of pasta sauce.
feeling like our conveyancing was going to fall apart
of a forest that can never stop
Kudos to Tony Pulis and Nick Hancock who are cycling in relay from Land’s End to John O’Groats for the Donna Louise Trust during four days in the summer. They hope to raise £100,000 for the charity. More here
This is a case where I think that perhaps he ought to start doing really heavy drugs again, if by chance he has stopped. And for Pete's sake, don't make another holiday album, Scott. Go back to not showering and I'll stop being mad at you, it's all going to be alright. But most of all, Scott Weiland….. shhhhhh.
“That’s right,” he said. “Being royalty is different. You need to get used to be different from other people. You are not like them. You are not supposed to be like them. You are supposed to be like me.”
“There was nothing I saw that was shocking, just stuff that is not (otherwise) available to the public,” he said.
Have a fun week. It is going to be hot down here.
Most depressingly of all, Simmons's profiling seems to be the occasion for a bit of arts-bashing in the finest traditions of Australian anti-intellectualism. For example, here's Simmons's take on all of German literature, as admiringly quoted by Crittenden: "German surrealist literature … well, perhaps all German literature actually, can often be categorised as reflecting a people who understand that everything turns to shit. This being the case, Gross und Klein fulfilled its objective." Take that, Goethe! And Botho Strauss, you bad "surrealist"!
Let’s call this song exactly what it is (what it is, what it is, what it is)
Shocked gasps of my fellow classmates . Their scared eyes. Some started pleading on my behalf.
Paris hosts can hire a quatorzieme. This is a professional 14th guest for parties of 13. FDR used his secretary as a quatorzieme.
This morning I got up and finished packing after a full night without disturbance. What was that? Yes, the roommate did not come back last night. At first, I thought she had somehow developed the ability to move less like a bull in a china shop, but then I realized that she had never returned to the room. Doubly awesome because that meant I got to move out in peace. Crystal came over to help me, like the wonderful person she is and we got everything moved out in three trips. I took everything guys – cleaned that room out. All the soap I’d bought, I took. She’s going to have to buy her own hand soap now. I also took something like 6 rolls of toilet paper. She had bought two 24 packs for like 17,000 won. We weren’t even done with the first pack. There’s no way she’s going to get through the second, so I took a few. And I don’t care. I also took the shower curtain that had been left in the room by the last tenant. Oh, and the broom and dust pan set, since I’m relatively certain she was never going to use it. Laughing my butt off right now.
Sat 19th
to find a place to live and check it out a bit more.
A while back I bought The Gardens of Provence and the French Riviera because it contained an essay with photographs of Roderick Cameron's last house, Les Quatres Sources, in Provence. The book was produced in the middle 1980s and has all the choppy, scattered arrangement of a page characterized by small images, floods of negative space and muddy photographic reproduction - a style of design that has not stood the test of time. However, the quality of 1980s book design is not what this post is about.
But besides that, I’m on the final week of what I need to make up as far as workouts for that class is concerned; all that’s left is, of course, turning them in, along with a final physical assessment. Besides that, I should turn in a final assessment for my walking class, but I really just don’t feel like doing it; besides that, I completed the final project and short answer essay and have turned both of those things in. In American literature, I’m completely done with that class and have left it with an A. British literature, all I have left is the final exam. And, of course, all I have left after that is my government final – speaking of, I need to do the review for it, though I think I may do it after I do my British lit final, since I really just want to get that over with.
While that is a rough paraphrase of a longer speech, the cuss word is an exact quote. That may be a mistake in a school system where one of my science teachers presented evolution as one of several theories. I imagine that guy got a kick out of Barack Obama's evolution on the issue of gay marriage.
“Yep,” she says. On cue, Murphy pushes the side of his snout across the rug, his rump up while his hind legs perform a spastic box waltz around the dining room table.
Second grade math- got it. The crisis in Egypt- yeah sort of.
Why? Because I AM THE CLIENT OF SEVERAL EXCELLENT HOOKERS THERE!
Okay, this is a two-in-one, hope that’s allowed, Carly! Again, my grandma gave me this to read when I was a teen, and I loved the feisty heroine, Cassandra, and her mission to ‘capture the castle’ – all the goings-on in her crumbling, eccentric household. With more than a nod to Pride & Prejudice, the girls of the house are all aflutter when two new boys move in nearby – Simon’s serious and a bit scary at first, but I remember being as fascinated by him as Cassandra is. If he was a pet I think he’d be a black Belgian Shepherd dog, you’d be slightly worried about going near him. Neil’s friendly and sporty – a bit like Circe’s best friend in my book – I think he’d be a golden retriever, enthusiastic, good fun, and excellent at fetching things!
"I have been published before" means I look you up on Amazon.
Inspired by Syfy’s popular Saturday Original Movies (Sharktopus, Mega Python Vs Gatoroid), players hunt down and capture a cadre of bizarre monsters to discover the dark secrets of their origins.
- My wife says: Why is everyone so annoyed with Rick?
After about five minutes of me embarrassing myself despite the fact that I was alone, I ended up glaring into the mirror and making my "war face" just like Gunny from Full Metal Jacket. And there they were, looking all sorts of fucked up like a trash compactor, staring at me saying, "You dumb motherfucker." That's right, my lovely broken teeth from a very large fist attached to an equally large man. This got me thinking about every stupid thing I've done in my life that's left permanent damage, either physical or mental. It also made me think of my son. My son, the big beastly five year old monstrosity who aspires to do great things like join the Navy and become Batman when he grows up.
WHAT: Looks like a cluster of well placed strokes done in a painting frenzy, huh? Or maybe some of you are thinking, “That is the COOLest letter “A” I have ever seen!” I’ll give it some more credit than that, though. Abstract art and simplified art are more complex than what I used to give it credit for. Me, of the devotion to realism, naturalism styles and Renaissance period. Even painting with the more freeing, loose style of the most simple (because there ARE, visually-speaking, more complicated examples of it out there) abstract art that consist of strokes, quick lines or big gong-size circles or squares on canvas…there still is a “method to the madness” (as my painting instructor, Dr. H. I’ll call him, used to say). Even when the work appears to be something that took as much mental effort as it takes to pick your nose, it is more complex than that! Much more. Even the most simple work came with a method and a lot of thinking. The title, “3 Paths”, refers to a visual secret in the paintng itself, a secret that is so obvious you can see it, really.
Old Business:
Now for the question:
Mangia Italiano (3145 South Grand) This sleepy little spot on South Grand provides not only a varied selection of beer, but also handmade pasta. It’s American-style Italian food, for sure, but it’s not that gloopy and gloppy stuff you’ll find at the big boxes places around the area.
Serving: After the cooked meat is put onto a clean plate, sprinkle some Kosher salt and pepper, let the meat rest on the plate for a few minutes before eating. Cover lightly with foil. This resting time allows for the meat juices to redistribute back into the cooked meat. While the meat is resting, prepare a tossed salad to go along with your steak tips. Additional steamed or grilled veggies is added nutrition to your meal. If you prepare enough steak tips and salad you then have another meal for the next day: cook once, eat twice!
Dear Father and Mother,
The royal wedding helped my cause. While most people’s attention was focussed on the happy couple, I hoped that Lakeland would be relatively quiet. Staveley, sleepy at the best of times, was a ghost town when I left the train late afternoon.
But, ultimately, how could he hesitate when a mere slip of a girl led the way under without hesitation? Ben took a deep breath and kicked his way into the narrow gap, following the rare Riasaur into the dark, constrained unknown.
To Magistrate Ide Todo,
with this wordless beauty, an
We went to buy some bread and eat
I do write first, but my writing is very drawing-based. I actually write in a drawing application, in Adobe Illustrator. So I'm not just writing in a word processing program, I'm creating these panels on the page and I create little text boxes for the narration or dialogue and I'm able to move that stuff all around. I'm thinking about the page as a two-dimensional field as I write, which feels to me like a kind of drawing even though I'm not drawing with a pencil or not drawing much. I will do occasional sketches. So that takes a really, really long time and that's how I get the whole story mapped out. If you saw the pages at that point, it would be just blank boxes with the text and the dialogue, with the narration and the dialogue and maybe a few images dragged in here and there.
Carly was mad her mom wouldn’t let her go to the movies with her friends. (I told you she was mad)
Surprise, I finally remembered to get some Candy on here lol, for a chance to win you don't have to be a follower, I want people to follow my blog because they like it not to win some Candy, but if you could please put a link to my Candy that would be great. If you are a follower you get an extra entry into the draw for the Candy!
I mentioned that it was feeling like the last minute when Morgan and I have had to find her a new Grad prom dress.. it felt like last minute anyway .. so we planned and decided to go down to David's Bridal just across the border on Saturday morning and hopefully find the perfect dress.
Organic clothing is not only good for the environment, but it is also very well-made!
Meanwhile, back home in Koodankulam, as this guest post by DEEPA RAJKUMARreminds us, unrelenting state repression continues of the massive, non-violent struggle against the proposed nuclear plant there.
When you are a pet owner, there are several pet services you may want to avail yourself of. The first step will be finding the right ones and that can be a challenge, but a good one when you consider the happiness of your pet. When you are searching for a great pet service, there are some key things to remember. Anymore there are services willing to do everything from walking to pet sitting while you are on vacation. Nevertheless, there are only a few you may need on a regular basis. Pet services such as day care, groomers and borders are among the most commonly used. Approach your search keeping in mind you are the employer and the pet service is the employee and do reference checks, license verification and ask for an opportunity to see them in action. Keep your eyes open at the facility, is it clean and do the animals look well taken care of?
"A4, M4," he repeated, "Are you Italian?"
What made those bullies
First part has a lot of library music tracks and very short uplifting moments.
1. Using a piece of dark brown card stock, run it through the Cuttlebug or Big Shot using your favorite Cuttlebug embossing folder or texture plate. (I ran it through 4 or 5 times to make sure that I got a good image.) Embossing folders or texture plates with larger designs work best.
Beaty stated that he took this action after holding an extremely productive informal political consultation and in-person strategic planning session with Mr. Putnam on Sunday afternoon, April 22nd. Beaty clarified that he and Mr. Putnam appear to share a number of the same deep concerns regarding many of the ill-advised recommendations issued by the Special Commission on County Governance including the proposed creation of a regional wastewater authority/district with taxation powers as well as the potential elimination of the democratically elected county legislature. Beaty elaborated, “We are both also staunchly against transforming the county government into one that would be modeled after a big city type of structure, which is what the Special Commission has endorsed by its official recommendations.”
+69 35 10.94 , +19 13 20.89
Add all ingredients except for the meat and noodles into a large skillet. simmer for about 5 minutes and then add noodles and meat, simmer until meat and noodles are warmed through and serve! SOO yummy!
That was when the young man
My grassy area was made by cutting some designer series paper using the adorning accents edgelits die. My sentiment was stamped and punched out using the word window punch and then I layered it using the modern label punch (I punched out two pretty in pink pieces and I layered them so that they would fit nicely behind my bashful blue punched layer. Next, I added a brad on each side of my sentiment and it's adhered onto my card using dimensionals.
Here is your first question, the dean said. ‘Without using numbers, represent the number 9.’
Final score: 6.5 out of 10
welcoming me in its embrace...
Tuesday, September 4th--I went to my regular doctor for a blood test.
Last but not least - Next week is the True Blue Craft Show at the Claremont showgrounds where Twiddleybitz will have a stand and I will be teaching 3 classes :)
The Comet’s Curse, the first book in the Galahad series, was a Spring 2009 Indie Next List selection, an ALAN Pick for August 2009, and a VOYA Top Shelf Middle Fiction selection for 2009. Now TOR is proud to announce the release of the sixth and final volume of the epic YA science fiction series, THE GALAHAD LEGACY (A Tor Hardcover; On Sale: February 14, 2012; $16.99).
Men with swords is also always a plus. A real historical basis is also nice (like in Grave Mercy) but it isn't necessary at all (like in all the others).
Layer 2: 1 3/4" circle punch, or some type of hole,
Love the fact there are various shamrock sizes and matching dies to this Verve set! Julee is the bestest :)
Control, control, and yet more control. All while this regime claims they cannot control crime. They cannot control squatting, protect property rights or carry out even the most rudimentary elements of good governance. They cannot control unbridled illegal immigration. Or so it appears.
1940's style, I'm am so happy the Marilyn Monroe-isque style is back, Scuba inspired neons, lace lace lace and Mexican/Navaho print, textures and fabrics and I am loving the color combos of mint and nude.
Last night I ventured out to York University for the screening of their third year film projects in an event titled ‘Finish Line.’ I didn’t know it was called this. I didn’t even know where it was. All I knew was that there was a screening and that if I take the 196 from Downsview, I should arrive relatively unscathed. When I did arrive at York, I realized that I had no idea how to navigate this campus and no clue where the screening was. Call me unprepared, but I was running on Red Bull fumes by that point so I was happy enough to be awake.
SOLUTION: Roast a bunch of veggies ahead of time, or whip up something quick like Spinach pasta with an organic jarred tomato sauce. I sprinkle a bit of grated parmesan over the top and let it melt over the pasta. And if I'm by myself and no one else is home, I whip up a protein smoothie and pack it with as many fruits and veggies as I can. I really, really love my smoothies!
Then on top of all that I have been working on costumes for the kids are in another school play which is coming up April 13th! So, I have been running non stop it seems since this time last year and looking at the calendar we won't be slowing down till maybe if I am lucky mid-june!
that are served on tiny wooden spears in the bars of the Basque
My grandson, Harry, now goes there; I collected him yesterday,
The outside is nice, if not a typical looking Florida style modular home. Everyone in his community has a house like this, but interestingly, they are all different. Some are bigger, some smaller, different colors, landscaping and driveways, the patio's are different or the homes are higher off the ground. When you look down the street you don't feel as though you are seeing the same image. I like that.
Anyway, the yoga was fairly successful, with the toughest moment coming when Ky looked up at the screen and said “I just don’t get this knees, chest, chin thing he keeps talking about.”
Roll dough to about 1/16" thickness. Fill with 1 Tablespoon of filling. Seal and crimp edges. Drop into 350ºF oil for about 2 minutes each side, until golden brown. Remove and place on paper towel. Drizzle with or dunk into prepared glaze. Enjoy!
Furthermore, it is necessary to everlasting salvation that he also believe rightly the
I did 30 minutes on the elliptical – 3.13 miles.
So did I leave it alone after it moved to perceived safety between some bricks? What do you think? I went and got the shovel and then proceeded to probe at it to get it out in the open where I could decide if it was a copperhead or a small rat snake. Did I have on shoes? What do you think? Anyway, the only shoe I can get on my bit foot is an
I ran home because I was too tired to walk.
I can't see the Eiffel Tower from my apartment. But, when the lovely landmark has its hourly display of strobing lights, I can see the reflection of it in my neighbhor's window.
Look : Deep orange almost copper with a slight haze to it.
A short time later, police surrounded the restaurant, and 35-year-old Robert Read, the manager, offered himself as a hostage to spare the others. The three took him up on his offer and held him at gunpoint as they tried to escape.
Published: March 8th 2012 by NLA Digital
every one around me half listens. it does not affect them directly, you see. they hear most of what i say. like it is their duty and they quickly forget. i forget. i lie down and i think of it as if it is a dream- a part of life that will go away as soon as i stop paying real attention to it.
At this time of year any helpful hints are welcome. My email inbox is flooded with food related newsletters and links to food blogs and websites. Serious Eats always has at least one or two good articles each week to check out and it is worth becoming a member of their online community to gain access to informative and often amusing articles and videos. This week's article 60+ Holiday Snacks in 20 minutes or less is definitely worth a click through if you have any entertaining to do this weekend. It offers clever, simple ideas to help keep your sanity and make you look like a pro.
I have to walk past that lot to get to the home where I feed a neighbor's cats. The other day I was passing by and I heard a strange groaning/grunting sort of noise. A strange noise from the guard dog. I looked over and rather than the guard dog, I saw this...
When I am not enmeshed in domestic minutiae, I can physically walk out and feel the wind colour my cheeks and notice and remember things I wouldn't at home.
Barack Obama was forced into a position where he had to rely on the U.S. military to save his political hide. And the U.S. military came through for him.
During month 3 I was feeling insecure and a little shaken up about my new freelance life. And some of that carried over into Month 4 - despite how much really great work I've had coming in. Every time I get a job I can't help but wonder where the next one will come from. And the one after that. I couldn't seem to shake these insecurities no matter how hard I tried - and they started to find their way into my body, the upcoming Everest adventure and into the evenings and weekends. Then I find myself stressed out about being stressed out - this was not part of the dream. My confidence is still there - it's just hiding out in the shadows - waiting for me to get over this scardey cat bullshit. All of that said, it has been one of the busiest months yet. I've got lots of projects in the works and a few completed that I can't wait to show you.
So I haven’t been writing anything in a while. You can blame my college professors who think it’s humorous to make us lowly undergraduate students suffer through midterms. And papers. And presentations. And quizzes. I say to all of you, screw you to the umpteenth degree.
(and still is, but I'm starting to come back around and get a handle.)
"What does being pro-life mean to you?" the reporter asked me after the annual Respect Life Mass at the cathedral in Denver on Saturday. (Update: read the article here).
I’m starting a new column in which I’ll give ideas that can change one’s life. I’ll be pulling my ideas from a variety of sources, as well as using things that I or my staff has found to work.
Sassoon married his first wife, Elaine Wood, in 1956, but the marriage ended in 1958 when she left Sassoon for British water-skiing champion David Nations. In 1967, Vidal Sassoon married his second wife, actress Beverly Adams. They had four children: two daughters, Catya (1968–2002), an actress who died from a drug-induced heart attack, Eden (born 1973), and two sons, Elan (born 1970) and David. Sassoon and Adams divorced in 1980. His third wife was Jeanette Hartford-Davis, a dressage champion and former fashion model; they married in 1983 and divorced soon after. In 1992 he married Ronnie.
1. This Gift-Wrapped Gallery from Mom on Timeout is such a creative way to make a room look extra festive! I love that she took something she already had (her family pictures) and dressed them up to make a huge impact in the room.
I think I should warn you first. I’m cranky. Capital C-ranky. I slept badly last night so I’m tired and I’m just annoyed. And no, stupid person in the back, it’s not thanks to Aunt Flo, Aunt Irma, or any other cutesie implied relative. Sometimes chicks just get cranky and it has nothing to do with hormones.
Shoes, cars, electronics, magazines and newspapers, entertainment and web needs, are just some of the coupon offers available from other companies and shared on the Frugal Dad site.
So there you have it, a half dozen of the World’s best athletes with windows of opportunity looking to close on their careers. All should play a major role in the upcoming Olympic season, and their stories should be closely watched. I will begin following them in earnest once the calendar opens up on the Olympic Year of 2012.
Prilla sent a telegraph to her parents in Cloverdale asking for help in returning home. They sent what they could. What they sent was just enough to keep her in her one room apartment while she looked for work as a tutor. Hopefully with enough clients, she'd raise the money and return to the only place that would appreciate her talents with children and her love of science and math.
“No, he knows me. He won't give The Look if I'm there. You never get it when they know you. When they know you you get something else, something like the shutters coming down and a pump action shotgun being cocked.... You'll learn about that later. For The Look, that works on an air of complete and utter surprise. You'll have to go in alone for that.”
Eight years ago, de Wesselow was a successful art historian, based at King’s College, making a name for himself in scholarly circles by taking a fresh look at centuries-old disputes over the attribution of masterpieces of Renaissance painting. Today, he still lives in the university city – we are sitting in its Fitzwilliam Museum café – but de Wesselow has thrown up his conventional career and any hopes of a professorial chair to join the ranks of what he laughingly calls “shroudies”.
‘Postman’s Knock’ by Angela Sherlock
5) Not A Crime (In The Old Time)
“Really, John. Tomorrow morning I'm outta here. The plane's booked and I've transferred my script to a hospital over there. If I stay I'm even more fucked than if I go.”
The last couple of days though have been really challenging, mainly due to the one thing that can stop play. Rain. Rain can be a real pain in the back end, water on the camera gear isn’t usually desirable although less of an issue with weatherproofed DSLR’s. It’s entirely possible to get some decent shots in rain though, you just need to adapt to the conditions. Remember too, rain can also come with extreme weather and nothing makes a better shot than extreme weather!
To get back to Leicester’s Jamaat al-Islami. This Islamist group has supplied mosques, throughout the UK, with radical imams. It has also set up ‘research centres’ like the one in Leicester itself. The result of this Jamaat al-Islami semi-monopoly was that a whole generation of Muslim kids were indoctrinated with Islamist and pro-Jihadist ideas, from Leicester and beyond.
PLUSES - Bright and colorful which are both nice descriptions for a set in my opinion. The large logo on the front is also appealing. I like the large letter "first word of a chapter" treatment of the first and last name.
And then to make things worse, when I came home and read about the Disney half marathon (and most half marathons) I realized that there are strict time limits and if you don’t hit a mile marker every 13 minutes, you’re out of there – eliminated and bussed to the finish line, thanks for trying ma’am.
Cassandra – 13
I am entitled to a place at the Heavenly table, and a part in ushering in the Kingdom of heaven now. More justice, more mercy, more peace, more life, today. If I want to. If I choose it. I am entitled to the truly good things of life, the fruit of the Spirit even. But if I want more joy, love, peace, patience etc. then I must make room.
We get so used to those walls that we begin to even decorate them…we take pride in the way our wall looks…. and feels… and we know, that all we have to do is close the door and the wall will make us feel safe… secure… free to relax.
If so, the appropriate historians should be able to cite the specific law in question, and I/we should be able to look it up online. The comments are open, folks. Have at it.
My mother and father separated when I was very young, only six years old. My connection with my father was always strong (I'd be allowed to go visit him every other weekend, stay with him for weeks at a time during longer Christmas and summer breaks), and it was basically the only thing that allowed to keep me my sanity from when I was a very young child until we finally moved to Florida, where I was unable to keep these meetings up.
.... while some of the others encouraged their toys to be extremely annoying. They were so annoying that they were partly banished from the interior of the Landcruiser....
She had 3 minutes to perform a cover and her original " Fall for you .. the cover is her own regaee / folk version of "nothin compares to u " hope you all enjoy it x
This weeks challenge has been set by the maga talented Natalia....the theme is summertime fun.....The wonderful Daisy Divas have worked their usual magic on the digis and wow just take a look...fab eh!
i can’t figure out why i keep taking on plus 40ish guy friends…here’s a breakdown of who:
Kam has her last orchestra concert of the year tonight and then she is looking forward to putting the violin away for the summer. She is totally loving dance lately and I am amazed at how quickly she is progressing!! Her jumps are so effortless, and her kicks are gorgeous. I always have had short, muscular legs, but hers are so long and lean, she just makes it look effortless. I love that she comes to me for advice on her technique.. I may be off the dance floor, but I still got it! We can be found at 10pm doing pirouettes in the kitchen, laughing as we slam into the fridge. I love my girl so much!!
Hope I can get them to heal quickly, probably won't be running any this week! So now I'm researching how to prevent them in the future!
* To set a variable named ‘debug’ in the module named ‘test_module’
I am part of a birth board. I joined it sometime during my 10 weeks on bed rest when I was pregnant with my daughter, she is almost four now. This is an amazing group of woman and we all have April 2007 babies. We have bonded together and even when babycenter switch formats and changed our birth board, we all migrated together over to another site and have been there together ever since. we have a sisterhood of around 200 mothers and I feel very close to many of the moms on the board. I have met many of them in real life and absolutely adore them.
lose a pound (I've gained like five in the last two months, not cool)
Much ugliness in Malaysia
Company critics have asserted that the Duluth, Minn., OEM now has the funding for the Vision, but not the engineering talent to push through a production aircraft to certification. Simmons countered that the firm still has a strong core and depth on its engineering team, including Chief Engineer Paul Johnston, Aero Structures Lead Paul Brey, Executive Vice President and COO Pat Waddick and Chief Vision Engineer Dave Rathbun.
Article 155
A cracking good time, and many thanks to Liz for organising!
Green Flash Brewing
Field Trip:
Add a sprig of rosemary or a potpourri sachet to the box to keep your mail smelling fresh.
Home inspection is generally about the overall checkup of the house by a certified home inspector. An assessment of the overall structure of a property is conducted. The major systems
Here's the link to see the collections from River Silks LTD:
The problem for me is that it starts from unstated but implicit assumptions about what local government is for, and about how its objectives are set. But those assumptions owe little to the concept of meaningful local democracy; they owe more to a centralist view of local councils as being primarily deliverers of services, the nature and standard of which is defined by central (in this context, Welsh) government. Their power, in short, is
And thank you also to those kind people who have taken pity on me and voted for me in the Dorset Cereals blog awards - I did suggest to the Ploughboy and the General that it might be a nice gesture to vote for their dear mamma, too, seeing as they are the digital generation, and it is just like Facebook, really, but so far, not much luck. I think that they are probably quite incredulous that anybody actually reads what I write at all.
I'm revisiting a story from a long time ago. It's called Door, and centres on a character called Lars, who works the doors in Manchester. It's a story about denial or repression, how childhood relationships shape our adult ones, and is a story where the reader realises things the character hasn't realised yet. I wrote it when I was doing my MA course in 2005 and it never quite worked. There was something in there somewhere, and some moments I liked. But I never felt the character or the situation were fully formed or quite finished.
2008: Ryan Howard (2nd)
had Given to us.
I’ve instantly taken a shine to Moving to New York, Lost in the Post, and Backfire at the Disco too.
Just like this.
The woman arrived in a nearby town, Moshav Mata, with her hands tied and bleeding from her chest and back. She told people in the town that she had been stabbed by two Arab men while she was hiking in a valley nearby.
8. The Kritter table from IKEA is the perfect spot for the boys to work on their letters or coloring skills and would also function as a space for them to complete their homework when they start school in a few years.
Some days ago I found the following saying:
‘Who is that? Are you alright?’
"The Problem of The Vanishing Man"
D) I often seem to be productive late afternoon, from 3-5 or 6. This can produce conflict though with parenting and housework.
For my ransom
I did a little poking around and found out that Seton had originally stood at the northern end of that avenue, where the Rio Nueces Apartments are today. A few years later I was apartment hunting in the area and settled on an efficiency right behind Rio Nueces, at the Mirabelle Apartments. The landlady showed me around, explaining that it was an older building with quirky design features, and said, “It was built as a dorm for nurses.” “Yes,” I chirped,” for the old Seton Hospital.” The landlady was surprised I knew this and no doubt realized right then how much trouble I would be.
Literally, and this is the correct use of the word, hundreds of people found it too hilarious that Pete had himself become a living Onion article. Comments poured into the blog informing him that he was an idiot. Comments also informed him of his douche-atude, assholiness, and of the sad, but amusing, fact that he had mistaken a satirical work of fiction from a world-famous publication as reality.
Your spirit guides my ways.
But fifteen years of studying never prepared her for this.
Winner: Clay
In today's fast-paced, money-focused way of life, I find it comforting to know there are people such as Dayton Hyde who put nature and conservation ahead of personal gain, and help keep our world in balance.
-Simon, Gurren LagannOf course, these characters come with such splendid American names. And what great names they are, ones you would normally find in America, such as "Roy Mustang" and "Spike Spiegel" (In his defense, Spiegel is German). I can't imagine what Japanese people think goes on in the United States, especially after the recent release of Heroman, which supposedly takes place o somewhere in California.Typical American kids wearing typical... omfg what is with that hair.
Back to MoP… the verdict is – I liked it. I really enjoyed myself and had fun playing. There are so many cute new creatures too. I fell in love with the field yak for some reason. Took a lot of screenshots of those things. Yep, I guess WoW didn’t jump the shark after all.
05 - Bullets (cuts off) (05:41)
I love it and wanted to share with all of you because if I wanted to make something special that wasn't the usual Charm Necklace I am sure there are more then a few of you who would like to do the same thing for a loved one but just never found a base that appealed to you.
Christmas was nice. Busy but nice. Holidays get a bit crazy for us as our families live out of state and we try to see everyone.
I did not know the Italian tradition when I jumped into schiacciata-making, because I was inspired first by the grape bread from the Vancouver bakery, Terra Bread. It’s wonderful stuff with a coffee or tea. Schiacciata means “crushed or smashed” according to one helpful cycling friend who visits her family in Italy. (For some reason, that term is used by some recipes to denote the grape focaccia version.)
- Solar powered models for heating water and providing electricity.
And yes, you can tell I’m all about books, since I based three separate silent auction theme packs around books. We’ve got the zombie one. We’ve got a Titanic 100th themed one, and we’ve got an awesome “beach reads” bag.
I thought the tears would no longer come. But as they dismantle the tarpaulins, the flowers, the chairs and all the trappings of a funeral, it hit me hard. The winds howled as they loaded you to the hearse, so did my heart.
I was picking up my brother at his house en route to Dallas. I ran into a couple of sprinkles on the way, and my old windshield wipers managed to spread the dust and pollen on the windshield into a thin layer right in front of my eyes. So I had to stop and get new wiper blades.
For anyone waiting on packages in the mail from me, I've been sick and haven't gotten to the post office.
1) EQ/Success/Positive Psychology
19. Read about Gallipoli in "Over There" With the Australians. It provides an interesting prospective; one I've never thought of before. I can't say though that I've had a ton of learning about Gallipoli.
While I'm at it, I'll share just a few more pics of my cute little store from the outside
(I burnt one batch so I had to taste test this lot - they were still a tad crunchy :-S)
Adobe flash player will be extremely preferred amidst this cellular phone organization. With regard to on the net videos and games, it’s necessary software program. Android driven cell phones assist the online world and you may visit just about any internet site anytime you desire. Nevertheless, a few web sites tend to be manufactured through the adobe flash and also thus, flash is actually essential in order to check out them. Apple offers stood versus the usage of adobe from the mobile devices along with this kind of purpose; Apple people is not going to be able to take a look at individuals net websites created throughout adobe language. Within the situation associated with android tablet Personal computer users, downloading adobe flash player can be an easy process and it opens up the entire earth regarding web in entrance with the users.
Deputies arrested driver Kristi Dane Clark, 23, of Lakeland, on charges that include carrying a concealed weapon, possession with intent to sell cannabis and possession of a firearm in the commission of a crime.
Bake at 350 degrees for 6-9 minutes. Be careful not to overback them.
How have you learnt to overcome the falls--not just as a writer, but in any part of your life?
In Africa the rape, torture and murder of white farmers and their entire families is now approaching the 4,000 mark, which equates to a full 10% of the white farming community. This signifies a higher mortality rate than that of active servicemen in WWII, and can only be described as racial genocide. Do an Internet search on “Farmers murdered South Africa” on the BBC news website, however, and you will find nothing, save for smear pieces about Eugene Terreblanche and “white supremacy”.
Today, I am thankful to live so close to much of my family!!! Since we moved back to Abilene, less than two short years ago, our lives have changed in many ways. One of the best changes is that we get to see loved ones much more frequently!
Here’s what I did instead:
The lesser trafficked stretch of Orange Drive, in back of the Hollywood and Highland complex, is now one of the most dangerous spots in the city - for those with an addiction to Chef Brock Kleweno's crazy delicious Japanese tacos and wasabi guacamole.
I give it a 4 out of 5. It held up pretty well, and it’s a pretty good story.
Hawkeyes, Daniels produced 123 tackles, 27 tackles for loss, and 15.5 sacks throughout his career at Iowa; his most productive season
Their responses made me feel as though I were an ancient text that had been translated wrongly. Just a few symbols out of place here and there and the meaning of everything changed all around me. Do you see yet how easily I have been taken out of context and slotted neatly back in where other people would prefer me to be?
And come cards for my April workshop...more details to come...
The Nether Folk would come.
Tokushima is a ‘small’ city of about 260,000 people in the northeastern part of the southern island of Shikoku. The closest international airport is KIX in Osaka, Japan. There is a small mountain in the city – Mt. Bizan – and many rivers leading to the Pacific. It looks like it’s not too far if I feel the need to see the ocean (I probably will – often.) The climate seems to be like that of northern South Carolina / southern North Carolina. Which would be perfect except the houses aren’t heated! And 35 is pretty cold without heat in the house! I think I will be spending a lot of the winter under my kotatsu (low table with heating unit) and in my wonderful Japanese bathtub. I am looking foward to some nice, warm/hot, sunny summers after the last 18 foggy summers spent in Carmel!
Until then... I will blog in the middle of the night.
Accessories: Martha Stewart Arch Lattice border Punch, snowflake brads, Kaiser pearls
“No one is holy like the LORD,
1 block light cream cheese
*Layered Stickers
If you're pressed for time, or if it's absolutely bananas in there, skip to step #4&5.
Comparative Politics: African politics, political economy of development, ethnic politics, political economy of disease
I'd love Jayne Keeney to stumble upon Sherlock Holmes in an opium den in Hanoi--her on a visa run, him indulging in a drug he used in refined form to enhance his understanding of the world. If she could withstand his arrogance and mysogyny, she could learn enough from him to become a truly great detective.
Ken kicked off the day by asking everyone to introduce themselves and say in a word what they were looking for. I was nearly last, and by the time it got to me, all my single word answers had been used by someone else: sharing, learning, collaboration, support, knowledge, and cake.
Milo: “It’s simple survival, Tom. You find the biggest kid in the playground and you stand next to them.”
Wednesday, May 9; 3:45 PM – 5:00 PM
Well, as nice as it seems that some atheists are favorably disposed toward religion, they can’t have it both ways. In fact, another atheist, who is a homosexual rights advocate in Britain, thinks de Botton and Spong’s ideas are both ridiculous. And he’s right! In a recent Spectator column, Matthew Parris calls religious believers to wake up and realize that their “faith is being defended by the wrong people, in the wrong way.” He warns us: “Beware…the patronage of unbelievers. They want your religion as a social institution, filleted of true faith.”
I Hunger Game You!!
The Board pointed out that, just because the phrase appears in the Pledge of Allegiance does not make it ineligible for trademark status. But the numerous third-party uses are "strong support for the examining attorney’s position."
Now, sitting across from him in Maui, talking about this and that, he suddenly said, quite out of the blue, “You should let something else, or someone else, write through you, instead of just writing from your ego.” I felt a bit defensive, because I had not posted any blogs in months for that very reason; as an ego, I knew I simply had nothing much to say or offer, and yet nothing else seemed to be wanting to come through me either. In response to Ram Dass’s suggestion, I said, “Well, I’m usually pretty dense when it comes to subtle energies or other dimensions.” He replied, “Well, your ego is dense through and through, but your soul isn’t.”
And poor handwriting, no matter how brilliant a paper may be, negatively influences the reader. Presentation is a huge part of the equation. Research also supports the conviction that children with better handwriting are also more adept at using proper punctuation, capitalization and grammar.
The oddest thing for me though is the fact that the lead character is an Essex boy! Yup, vampire Bill, or rather Stephen Moyer, hails from Brentwood in Essex, just 20 odd miles from Piley Towers! "gor blimey it's bleedin' taters in them fackin graveyards today init".... well maybe.
Watching the Charlie Sheen Roast where he goes off script, not only do we see a comic seemingly hitting his stride within the zeitgeist, but like Vick on the run, Kobe breaking off triangle, someone who's always at their best winging it on-the-fly. At 1:25 Patrice says to a black guy near the front row, "congratulations to you! look at the white woman you're with!" Ha. Do not try this at home!
I'm the lucky girl who gets to celebrate her birthday...I so love a birthday celebration!!!! What about you guys? Does it bother you to get older, or are you like me, and think it's a great reason to celebrate?
Young Jewish immigrant Julius comes of age surrounded by the wild world of 1867 Nebraska. While traveling in the American West, he is captured by the Ponca Indian tribe. Living as a slave, Julius meets the noble chief Standing Bear and his young daughter, Prairie Flower, with whom he falls in love. Becoming the tribe’s interpreter-its speaker-his life seems safe and settled. But Julius has reckoned without the arrival of his older cousin, Alexander-who, as the Great Herrmann, is the most famous young magician in America. Filled with adventure, humor, and colorful characters, Magic Words is a riveting adventure about the nature of prejudice, the horror of genocide, and a courageous young man who straddles two worlds to fight for love and freedom.
offices of ThisDay worsened
Isaiah 6:8: Also I heard the voice of the Lord, saying, Whom shall I send, and who will go for us? Then said I, Here am I; send me.
Here’s the link for her website: Hungry Girl If any of you are already familiar with her, please leave me a comment to let me know your opinion. If you’re not familiar with her, I invite you to check her out. I”ll be interested to know how some of her recipes taste if anyone tries them.
to discuss the in laws. Do you get along well with them or are their
OTHER INFORMATION
Good Morning Everyone, Happy Wednesday!!! I hope everyone is having a GREAT week!!! Today I would like to share with you a darling creation I made with this BRAND NEW image by Elisabeth Bell for SCACD..... Hope you enjoy my creation today!!!
See, our son came out of the womb with locks to rival Liberace's, a trait he gets from his dad:
With roots in the Celtic harvest festival of Samhain and the Christian holiday All Saints’ Day, the modern Halloween is a secular holiday that takes a light-hearted look at witches, ghosts and other creatures. In 2011, Halloween falls on a Monday.
the deceased family that died in a car crash on their way
Obama has momentum. More than a few Israelis, including present and past campaign managers are getting ready to eat their hats if Obama wins.
Anyhoo, I registered to be a member in August and am enjoying it so far. I like having a record of how many words I've written, how fast I wrote them, if I got distracted, which words I wrote the most, and how I felt when I wrote it. Plus you earn points and cute badges for accomplishing goals, like writing three days in a row.
Well, it turned out that this sandwich tasted like the vegetarian version of a Philly Cheese Steak. Grilled Portobello mushrooms were incredible and meaty. Artichoke hearts were creamy like mayonnaise. The sun-dried tomatoes added tang and texture. I still didn’t like Feta but that was ok. The hoagie was delicious.
Who now holds a cone dripping with
era Ponty. this music fits the category like a custom fitted glove.
Good Morning Cardmakers! Its April 15th, time for a new sketch and a new reveal. Today is also the reveal of our new Design Team. Drop on by their blogs and check our their work!
It’s an old expression
Trying to explain or understand my love affair with London is something I've been trying to figure for years, and I've finally come to a conclusion: there is no right answer, no rhyme or reason, it just is.
Do ya see any organizations stepping in to protest THAT! No, of course not. Most likely due to the fact that there is no ethinticity issues involved. Only because, I’m assuming, no one really knows what ethnic background a chicken is.
communication. It brings down
Growing up in an academically focused missions home, I saw first hand the irreversible impact that education has on the life of an individual; combined with the love of Jesus, education has the undeniable ability to transform mentalities & whole nations.
There have been a few changes this year. The festival is split into two halls because of the shape of the venue. In the past the Scottish Bar was in the smaller hall and the English Bar in the larger. This year for the first time the Scottish Bar is in the main hall. These days there are so many Scottish breweries that this move was long overdue; in previous years you could barely move in the packed Scottish Bar.
Ray Walston – Mr. Hand
I began my picture organizing by making a plan first. I knew I didn't have a lot of pictures of my husband and I when we were dating (or at least not enough for three boxes to be filled up) so I decided to put all of our pictures (1994-1996) in one box. I knew I went digital with my pictures in 2007 so I needed enough boxes for each year from 1997 to 2006. I purchased my picture boxes at Hobby Lobby (if you wait until they are on sale, you can get them for $1.99 per box).
I had asked for a slower labor, one where I eased through every stage, and this is exactly what I got. I usually slam through transition, with throwing up and whatnot. I almost couldn't tell that I was there, it was so different that I was a little confused (just when you think you have these things figured out...). I had one heavy contraction that felt like a bulge moving downward. Instinctively I knew what was happening, but it took me a minute to connect that it was go time. Gavin had the tub ready, so I went ahead and got in. We figure I had eased on through transition, with no puking, per request.
Human conditioning... it’s a wonder.
Ten years ago, little was heard of Islam in Europe. Today, we can read endless proven stories of segregated swimming pools, halal meat served in public institutions, religious studies in schools operating with an anti-Christian and pro-Islamic bias, areas of European cities operating under Islamic law, a blind eye turned to polygamy and police forces failing to uphold the law of the land for fear of violence, choosing instead to clamp down on indigenous Europeans who speak out.
Successfully completed “Managing Information Technology Projects”, a Masters-level course sanctioned by George Washington University and McMaster University
In Hico (pronounced "Hie-co,"), we ate lunch at one of those convenience stores/gas stations/restaurants that are so prevalent in small Texas towns, where Her Majesty gorged herself on some pretty tasty French fries, so much so that an older man came over to us and said, in all seriousness with a voice wrecked by years of tobacco use, "She shore likes them 'taters." He sounded exactly like Billy Bob Thornton in Sling Blade.
The mixture can then be kept in a container or bowl, partially covered to allow gases to escape. When you are ready to use it keep two cups for yourself and give one away to a friend with the recipe instructions.
But, you understand although these are just a few of my favorite things, they are just that - THINGS! My most favorite things are not things, but persons and relationships. "The greatest of these is love!"
This story is a microcosm of a much larger picture. This particular woman is dating a man who had well over half a dozen assault convictions and multiple outstanding warrants for his arrest on many other pending charges. This blows my mind for a couple of main reasons. First off, after so many assault convictions how is that he still finds a way to remain a free man? He obviously has not learned from prior mistakes. If I am not mistaken but the jail is part of the CORRECTIONS department. So if his wrongs have not been corrected shouldn’t that, by definition, mean he should still be in jail? Either way, he is currently a free man due to the fact that he has skipped court and other various reasons. Second part of this story that floors me is the fact that she is with him. How many of these assaults were against her? I have no idea and honestly is none of my business. I see this type of thing all the time, where the woman is being beaten by her husband or boyfriend but refuses to leave him. So many of these women end up being murdered or beaten to the point of needing serious therapy to overcome the trauma of the abuse. I will never understand the logic that goes behind the decision of staying with someone like that.
... not to mention that my hearing is also impaired on these kind of nights. He is definitely not slurring his words. I am just getting old and deaf.
He will bless them who fear the LORD, both small and great.
The patchwork has been made out of 2x2 squares that I have stitched together. I have used "Kladdkaka" and "Kärleksmums" for the patchwork.
Mason is also highly positive about some other iPhone applications, including a barcode reader, a piece of dictation software, and a basic orientation program which can help the user find out the name of the nearest intersection. The dictation software takes spoken language and turns it into electronic text. Mason told me that she uses it to dictate her text messages, instead of typing on the rather clunky on-screen keyboard.
You'd have to be an expert to appreciate it, or at least read an expert's book with your knee pads strapped on securely, and then it would be very obvious.
Need to make some more, it is fun to do!
"You may live in Paris," she said "but you are not FROM Paris".
As you can plainly see, I don't know how to link without the whole gobbledygook coming up, but one day soon...
New Girl
Do or Don't?
Yep, that's pretty much what I had going on with The Hunt.
They TERRIFIED me. Actually, attics terrify me. They're so mysterious and creepy and hot. It's no wonder that's where both ghosts and rodents decide to make their home.Perhaps also the ghosts of rodents.
03 Panoptikon
Today is the day!!! My 2012 free Block of the Month Quilt design is officially launched! Thank you to everyone who entered my poll to see whether you wanted the quilt to be revealed now, or month-by-month. Of the 433 people who voted, 70% said they wanted to see the complete quilt right at the beginning. That is an overwhelming response, so, close your eyes and scroll down if you don't want to see it all now!
but for some reason, in this generation, muslimah immediately means a hijaber. aneh.
831 **D-III/29(B)/1982. “Conscientious Objectors and Military Conscription.” Religion and the Commonwealth Lecture Series, Political Science Department, Memphis State University, Memphis, Tennessee. (Incorporated in Item C-1987(4), above, pp. 127-45.)
reading is not an option
ME: Um...is this a JELLO cup?
But the biggest obstacle remains adolescence itself. It is a confusing age, and it definitely doesn’t seem to be getting any less so. (Thanks a lot, global political/economic/cultural/technological upheaval.) The characters are sympathetic because they are going through the same things the readers are (or were). They are misunderstood, uncertain, disrespected (it’s right there in the word “minors”), and liable to be ignored on the one hand or to attract the wrong kind of attention on the other.
August 6, 2011
Luke records two responses to Jesus’ announcement of forgivenness. Here his words again:
For some unknown reason, I head towards the dog first. He instantly stands up and licks at me face. Then he jumps up, both paws slapping me wet face cheeks. A stray claw scratches me on the side of the face and I smile. I can't help noticing that the whippet seems to have a ruffled streak of hair on his head. A bit like a mohican. A whippet with a mohican?! You couldn't make these things up, could you?
Today’s “wise words” are from Jobs’ inspiring commencement speech at Stanford in 2005, which I used to carry around in my purse—it’s that good. These words came to mind as I read the speculation that his pancreatic cancer had taken a turn for the worse:
Good morning everyone!!!. Here is another card for the Hambo Hoedown challenge!!!. The challenge this week, number 52, is to use brads, buttons or bows. Please join our challenges every Wednesday at Hambo Hoedown and please visit our Design Team members for lots of fun creations, there are on the right side of my blog under "Bacon Bits"!!!.
Here in Bamako, by contrast, even the backing of every institution of the state may not be enough to confer legitimacy on a head of state who, rightly or wrongly, is perceived as having violated the public trust and failed in his duties as a leader. A lot of the people I’ve been talking with see political legitimacy as contingent on actions rather than an institutional mandate. Whatever Mali’s constitution may say, these citizens want a failed leader out — even if it means replacing him with an unknown with no legal basis for ruling, at an extremely dangerous moment in their nation’s history.
Long distance runners have to judge exactly how far they can push their bodies while still keeping a reserve for the final sprint. Bicyclers in the Tour de France have to hold just enough in reserve to explode into the lead at the right moment.
The move is viewed by many as a precautionary measure ahead of crucial nuclear talks with Iran.
They will continue to monitor our chat rooms, our blogs and and out discussion boards and seek to twist anything we say. They will try to link any criminal who once knew someone who thought about voting BNP to us, and worse than that, they will try to use against us the laws which they passed for that very purpose. What they tried to do to Nick Griffin and Mark Collett they will try again, and some of us may become casualties.
1. Number one on the list is people eating noisily. This turns me into a raging Xanthippe, especially at the cinema. It has the potential to ruin a trip for me.
It seems to me that the life of a woman is valued much less than that of a man. When a man accuses a young woman of sexual immorality, she would be stoned to death if the charges stand. According to the section in Deuteronomy 19, if the man bears false witness against the woman, he should be stoned to death as well, but instead, he is only fined one hundred shekels. Unless having the young woman whom he detests as his wife for life is the equivalent of a death sentence, the man is let off rather easily.
"I saw planes, trains, and automobiles.
EDIT (9 hours later): Holygoddamn, Beyblades are expensive. My altogether is in August, that'll accord whoever wants to absorb a kajillion dollars on me abundant time to save up. I aswell appetite a pony.
she kind enough telling me that I can use the sauce
The Reader's List starts off with some very dubious novels - Ayn Rand's and L. Ron Hubbard's book at the top of the list?! The Scientologists must have spammed the voting. It also includes some books I really like, but I don't know if I'd include them in a list of "best novels" - Lord of the Rings, To Kill a Mockingbird (loved it as a child, although it makes me wince a bit now). There's a lot of science fiction on the list - two by Heinlein, Dune by Frank Herbert. Oops, I didn't go down far enough on the list, because there's more than 2 Heinleins, including The Door into Summer, which I always loved because of the cat character - who was always looking for the door into summer. The Reader's List also includes The Satanic Verses (Salman Rushdie). I bought it when it was first published - I was living in Israel at the time and it wasn't very easy to get hold of. I found a copy by going to the Jerusalem International Book Fair, where you could order it from an anonymous bookseller (no kidding - Rushdie's life and those of his translators and publishers had been threatened by Iran). My copy came in the mail a couple of weeks later and I tried valiantly to read it, but didn't get more than 100 pages in.
Are these warning signs an indication that one should find another path to a destination? These signs don't seem to have that effect. People don't take them seriously. Also, given the fact that every building seems to put these signs on their sidewalks, I think it would be largely impossible to find a clear non-falling-ice path.
I write about my mom often on this blog, mentioning how she's helped me so many times on projects, but she is so much more to me than her creative skills. Our relationship has taken many turns, as most do, and over the years I have come to recognize her unending generosity and support, her sage advice, her hardworking nature, her intelligence and her kindness.
We signed up for a broadband bundle with them in January and have had shambolic service from them since. We're moving house on Saturday and I've been determined to take this opportunity to kick them to the kerb. They wanted a pay-off as we'd be breaking our contract with them. They couldn't decide on an appropriate fee, so I decided that they shouldn't impose one at all. And I finally got them to agree.
Can we say that Latin America was given the thumb up or thumb down? I believe that as a Region we are on the list! And unfortunately this is something not to be proud of. But who are not in the list? There is always light at the end of the tunnel and thus, the region can have a look at other counterparts and neighbours such as Panama, Nicaragua, Honduras, El Salvador and Uruguay.
But you are in my heart
Long or short,
These Cauliflower Pickles are so addictive! They are great served alongside roasted meats, and make really good appetizer, in my case, so addictive to snack on, that it is so difficult to stop! I have made this a couple of times already, and everyone who has tasted this love it!
It is why so many "writers" don't feel even a moment of self-reflective shame for sifting out nouns and verbs from existing works and rearranging their context or morphing a flawed protagonist into another flawed protagonist with fins or scales or wings or fangs.
Frank runs half the time and walks half the time. Now, we don't know the time, so let it be t. We can write an equation about the total distance:
Hi Everyone! Spring is definitely here and I'm enjoying this beautiful dogwood tree just outside my garage door! I try not to post the selections too far out, but I thought we could try to go through August. If you would like to make a selection, just leave a comment below. I'll take them first come, first serve. Don't forget to check the "Recipes" section to see what's already been baked. If you make a selection, please commit to baking with us!!!
Not all was peaceful. When he tried to build a temple to Jupiter on the site of Solomon's temple, the Jews revolted in a war lasting three years. His relations with the Christians were generally not confrontational, but during Hadrian's stay in Greece (123-127) he was initiated into the Eleusinian Mysteries, according to Eusebius, and then, with new-found pagan zeal, persecuted local Christians.
The bottom line is that a good Bible Atlas has yet to arrive for the iPad.
Sound off. I’d like to hear from both camps.
She was cut out using my Spellbinders Circle Nestabilities and then adhered onto patterned paper - which is from Lily Bee Designs This & That 6 x 6 paper pad.
Ive always wanted to adopt, as long as I can remember. It just always seemed right to me, to help someone in need, create a family and still be able to make the world a little more like me, without having to give birth. Plus, I always feared the worst- my biological baby was sure to end up an ex-vegan, pro-life evangelical preacher/police chief libertarian. I was never able to shake this, despite constant societal pressures for me to “get married and have babies” (as a woman that was all I was supposed to be interested in). If I had a nickel for every person that told me, “It’s a phase”, or “Wait til you meet the right person”, or “You’ll understand later” I would be a gajillionaire. To be honest, it was really scary, thinking that the thoughts I had were somehow invalid and stalled, I thought I knew who I was. As I get older, Ive learned that my thoughts were worthwhile, and justified. Not now, but later, I do want to adopt children. They won’t look like me (and might not end up being the same species), but one day I will have my own kind of family.
A lovely simple recipe for Banana Bread from Domini Kemp's Saturday page in the Irish Times Magazine, which I veganised (and reduced the sugar in) with great results. Bananas are a natural raising agent so they deliver a lovely high, springy loaf. Gorgeously banana-y too!
like our hearts could in the winter melt.
The winner as chosen by random.org is...... #10 Katiecuddles!!!
The body of one -
Coaching and development are important regardless of geography, but given the dynamics within emerging markets, and the workplace changes organizations can expect in the future, it is even more critical to offer this support to retain employees.
On my third attempt, I tweak the recipe a little and made a chocolate version out of it. On my latest endeavour, I cut down even more sugar. I must have felt overly confident, and did another bold change to the recipe...I replaced a small portion of the oil with milk as I feel that the cake is slightly too oily.
The skies above are here again
Have y’all been watching the coverage of the royal wedding? I just woke up so I need to check in!
I've not read the book so I cannot recite
I was looking forward to that. Pedicures are so relaxing, and manicures are relatively painless, and also, almost as if they knew, I had gotten another frequent-buyer free drink coupon from Starbucks. I had to go near Starbucks to get to the nail place (or at least it wasn’t too out of the way to do so); therefore my plan was to get myself the biggest peppermint mocha I could, head over to the nail salon to which I had been given a gift certificate, and let my stress melt away while I sipped minty, chocolatey goodness and had my feet massaged.
The pension funds would invest the proceeds in stocks and bonds with a target investment return of 8.5 percent a year, but the interest on the bonds was only about 5 percent. This was marketed as a free lunch, but it wasn’t one: Interest payments were fixed but Illinois taxpayers were on the hook to pay if the assets underperformed, which they did.
The second thing you can do is to repeat it starting on a different note.
The intention of the bill is to guarantee that abortions occur prior to a fetus acquiring the ability to feel pain according to the Republicans who proposed the bill. However, the bill conflicts with “Row v. Wade”, which allows abortions up to 24 weeks into a pregnancy.
close on
Sunday, we were sitting at a Mexican restaurant and Brent tried the salsa, "Blech, 'asty!" What? He repeated it. For your info, " 'asty" = "Nasty".... NICE. There is suspicion he picked up the word while a diaper change was being done. Today, he added, " 'ats 'asty" (That's nasty)...and other than "ok" it is his favorite new phrase! It is rather amusing though...
I don’t recall how it started but we laughed ’til we cried about our almost trip toMt.Hood; about how our snow boots didn’t touch the snow; about how while I was looking for the exit, they were looking for a parking space. It really was hilarious, and we laughed all the way back to Portland. I may not have walked in the snow or taken any pictures of the lodge, I have my memories of flipping out and laughter with friends. I suspect, too, that what Star said is true: “When we both get back to Atlanta, every time the words Portland, mountain or snow come up, we will no doubt fall out laughing hysterically!!”
I don't know enough about the technology to assess its accuracy, but the story from Mr. DA Confidential doesn't inspire confidence. It does make me confident, though, that SCOTUS decided the Melendez-Diaz case properly last year when they found that defendants had the right to cross-examine lab workers whose reports are presented as evidence at trial. Without that right, in this instance Mr. Dorsen's client would still be sitting in the Travis County Jail based on a clumsy (and perhaps common) forensic error.
We're sure that you'll have lots of innovative ideas and can't wait to see what you produce.
So. The best I can do is to write as fast as I can now and hope for the best. I figure I'm within 100 pages of the end. Maybe...just maybe...I can get this done. And even if I can't, I'll spend a lot of time thinking about it, reconfiguring it, twisting and turning it.
Followed by a steaming hot clay pot of chopped chicken thigh meat with lots of pickled ginger-good for the gut.
A mother's love knows no boundaries and that doesn't just exist in our human world. Deep near the ocean floor in a well hidden cave surrounded by a beautiful coral reef sits a mother...cuddling her tiny son. She waited so long for this little miracle to arrive and she will protect him without hesitation. There aren't any creatures of the deep that will harm a mermaid...as the merfolke are the protectors of all living things of the sea. However, small merbabies and even toddlers seem to be enthralled with the bubbles that the whales spout for them...just to hear them giggle. This can be one of the happiest sights to behold until one of the little ones gets a tad to close and gets trapped in one of the bubbles and bounces toward the surface. The whales start to sing a song to the mother what has occurred and as fast as she can swim...she is after her little one before he breaks the surface. The whales swim behind her, ready to give her a boost should the bubble actually break the surface. This isn't the first time that little Chaz has been caught inside a bubble. If you look closely at his mother's fin then you can see a tiny piece bitten off. That day she was able to burst the bubble and hold Chaz close in her arms but as she descended back into the water something tried to grab HER. You see...the only creature that would harm a mermaid would be one of the sky creatures.
Since producing this, I got some feedback from a professor I know locally who deals with design. He gave me some suggestions on ways I could easily improve it -- make "MICHAEL" and "HAYNES" be the same width by changing font sizes and tighten up the distance between "GRAVITY'S" and "PULL." Both of those make sense to me and I may do that at some point. It's not hard to upload a new cover. If nothing else, I plan to use those tips when designing future covers.
Digital South, Digital Futures
Did everyone (who celebrated) have a good Thanksgiving?! I know we did. My whole family went down to Andy's family's Thanksgiving dinner on Thursday and it went quite well. I'm glad that our families could get together on a day like that and get along so well.
So after you’ve counted it, checked all major organs are still there and that the money isn’t due to the sale of one of them, re-counted it, and then jumped up and down on the bed throwing £50 notes about (we all would) the question now presents itself, how do I spend it?
RSVP: ademelle
Barbeque grills can range from extremely cheap to very expensive depending on the type and features available on it.
As I am unwanted for even the lowest vice-chair position I will be redefining for myself the role of a backbencher for the remaining part of my term in office. I have so far managed to combine being loyal to the ruling group when it comes to voting, with being independent-minded. However, I am increasingly of the view that the example of a backbench MP is one that should also fit with local government.
Check this out...it's an elephant painting a picture!
Later, when I started reading myself, I jumped headlong into the world of fiction. I read countless novels: sometimes as much as three books in one day (people are sometimes skeptical when I tell them I've read thousands of books, but I always assure them that really, I have)! Historical fiction, teen contemporary fiction, mysteries, the supernatural... And of course, always fantasy. Where my interest in other genres has waxed and waned over time, fantasy has remained a constant (if you ever want good recommendations, just ask me. I'll happily geek out about fantasy novels anytime!). I love fiction, and have loved it for many years. The way whole stories, characters, places can become so very real in the pages of a book is just...incredible. I love reading stories.
After looking at a lot of inspirational images I was able
*Cardstock: PTI white; Stampin' Up! Wild Wasabi, Marina Mist, Basic Black
I wonder if anyone else noticed the tap dancing man at the bus stop this morning. I wonder if others thought he looked stupid or foolish. I loved that he clearly didn't care.
During a college party at a rival dorm, my friends and I stole a poster of Luke from them. It was just too awesome not to and isn’t that the type of crap you do with “rivals”? Steal stuff? Except we were at a women’s college so we didn’t care about statues and shit like that. No! Teen Idol Posters dammit!! We put it in on our bathroom door and then drunkenly posed in front of it. Possibly with varying degrees of clothing on. I’m not sure. I was drunk. Anyway the poster was our pride and joy and we called that pose “Luke-ing” and it became a fave dance move of ours at parties. And then those bitches stole it back. When I sent this Amazon link to these same friends last night I can’t tell you how many of us (all) had the same reaction: “hmmm…where could I put this in my house??”
Diane M. Hale-McKinzy, 38, Alexandria, Va.
I’ve been writing since college (which is now, inexplicably, a couple of decades ago), and wrote a novel during graduate school, but never fully believed in it. Then, during my years in publishing, I started another novel for middle-grade readers. Only after having my two kids, however, did I finish it, revise it a few hundred times, and finally get an agent (yes, the lovely Sara Crowe) who sold my book, THE WHOLE STORY OF HALF A GIRL, which comes out this January.
Fish come in three varietes in Egypt, Fresh water, from the nile, and saltwater from the Mediterranean, and the Red Sea, where species are different.
Not many people are aware of the natural wonders that are scattered across this nation: From the Rocky Mountains in the Midwest to the soaring redwood trees along the west coast. National Parks in the United States have outlived generations and continue to showcase their beauty. I’ve always admire the outdoors and find fascination in the natural aspects of life. In order for me to keep a record of my destinations, I’ve discovered the Passport to National Parks made available to fellow admirers like me. To me, it’s a way to feel like a child again, being able to collect stamps from different locations around The United States. Many National Parks stamps can be collected at park visitor centers and ranger stations to serve as a personal record. In the United States there are 397 locations where one is able to acquire a stamp. The passport is provided with a brief history and information about each location.
The case was brought by Mr Wilson, proprietor of a Community trade mark for the words MR SPICY, registered in respect of food, sauces and spices and provision of food and drink. Mr Wilson complained that sponsored links to third parties' websites appeared when a user typed "MR SPICY" into Yahoo!'s search engine - arguing infringement of his trade mark by the defendants.
Eddie made a simply stunning six layer Pink Ombre Cake with basket weave frosting. (Look at all that pink gorgeousness!) I wanted to try to make an ombre cake myself about one second after I saw his.
Using air once, and replacing it every morning with fresh is just wasteful.
2) Washington Redskins: QB Robert Griffin III
Professional Counselors and Registered Nurses. This program satisfies the Illinois Social Worker 3-hour ethics requirement.
Jesus, in the anointing of the Christ, walks as a true Son in the midst of a broken humanity which is desperate and disconnected from God. Having installed the operating platform of Sonship, he exists as a Priest before God and, now, he is released man-ward as Prophet, to make Father and His intentions known. For the first time in the planet’s history, there is an unhindered flow of from Father’s throne into the earth. The chosen method of this revealing: A Son who functions both as Priest (God-ward) and Prophet (Man-ward).
I found a pair of screech owls about 500 yards away (down the street) from Site 2 I had the intention of seeing if any owls were around by imitation, but I heard one calling first (all the better), then saw it flying through a couple of trees, it looked like it was catching insects in and around the branches as it was flying from branch to branch more like a warbler than an owl. It was eventually joined by a second owl. So ‘she’ is not incubating yet. But they should be staying near by. From the experience watching owls with the boxes, they don’t travel very far right after fly out.
"Hey. You see those bums over there?" I point to a couple of the local bus-station regular homeless who were slouched in the corner with their trash bags full of junk.
You do not love me, little liar. You love the monks, and secretly—for you have told no one but me, and that, inadvertently—you want to be one. You cannot, for it has been explained to you that but for a little cleft in place of a stick, you could have had whatever you wished. Do you not see how this world binds you, and how I offer you freedom? When the bells are broken and the dogs all dead, I shall lift you on my shoulder, show your nakedness to those who denied you, and they shall fall in columns of fire while you expose your sacredness for worship. Of course, it will all be Gomorrah by then. You would not remember. It is as yesterday to me, that paradise. His destruction of it only culminating my delight, a climax of euphoria. I might have wept then, but no. Not until you.
Alternatively, there are some people who are good at learning languages who put together meanings of phrases in simple passages of prose who may well not have bothered too much about matching exact letters or letter-combinations with the appropriate sounds.
And now…here I am eating Doritos with sour cream and making a permanent imprint of my butt on the couch. I don’t even buy Doritos. For some reason they happen to be in the pantry and all of sudden I had flashbacks of late night study sessions in college and bam…half the bag was gone. What is that? That’s completely not Warrior mentality. That’s fat-ass mentality.
A tsunami is where water rises above 15 feet, it can affect all its surroundings, but the highest length of water is 15 to 30 feet.
If that mother can let go of expectations of their child, of what they should do or be, it's easier to do what is right and best for that child because what is done is directly for that child, not for the mother and through that, you will be the best mother you can be. If a child cries and a mother soothes, she will be a better mother than one who shushes her child.
Law’s great brutality, and in many respects, its great achievement, is its artificial finality. Judge and jury cannot shrug. They can fail to be convinced, but they cannot avoid making a decision.
I hope this has given you some ideas of which art to choose. Now that you have your portfolio, you have a goal, you have your art, my next post will talk about good habits in maintaining a portfolio.
10 Futures by Michael Pryor
As the applause grew to unprecedented levels, Williams retreated. He literally just sat silently, staring straight ahead, while Gingrich rose above the applause to say:
You are showing strong emotional vampire behaviors. You may ask your loved ones if they feel drained by a specific behavior–such as being negative but being unwilling to get help. Seriously consider their suggestions about how to improve your communication. Be compassionate with yourself all along the way.
Elayna was born addicted to meth, and spent 2 years neglected and abused before coming into foster care for good and coming to us. She has been dx with bipolar disorder....
Sometimes it really upsets me --
By the way, during transferring I got a taste of the Brett-inoculated Saison that will be my next Lambic. Woo-hoo! This new Brett Baby is going to be tasty!
Erm..can it be a hairstyle? DREAD LOCKS! Yuck! I can't believe I used to think these were cool.
“One dog had been shot several times. One dog had blunt force trauma to the head. One dog, we think, had its neck snapped,” said Nicole Busick, Hancock County Dog Warden.
I am in the middle of final exams. My semester of three classes over the last eight weeks is almost at an end. It was insanity to do this, but somehow I did. I sacrificed my GPA only slightly with the choice, and got nine credits out of the way in the meantime. I am on fire to finish my degree quickly, particularly before our little Dude comes home and likely takes time away from me to complete my education. When this semester ends, I will have seven classes remaining in my college education. I wish I could find a way to finish sooner, but all I can do is continue to work hard and pray.
She kind of jumped out of the tub when I released her at the end, and I caught her with "her" raggedy towel. Drying off seemed almost worse to her than being in the water. When I let her go, she plopped down in the living room and went to work licking herself dry.
Cost: $7.00 per person (as per theater policy, all walkers need a ticket)
Like most cases that gain national attention, the Zimmerman-Martin ordeal has stirred emotional responses in people that often cause them to jump to conclusions before all the facts are available. There are several controversial issues at hand in this case, and advocates on all sides of these issues appear to be drawing conclusions in this case that help support their positions regarding these issues.
Abigail's first sentence - she was about this same age, I believe - was "Please give the baby the papi (her word for pacifier)" or something very close to that.
Creating content plays an increasingly important role on the Web. For years, blogs have given a voice to anyone with a Web browser and a willingness to write. Now, new tools such as Apple’s iBooks Author, released earlier this year, take self-publishing to the next level, allowing people to create free or affordable multimedia books. Together, these technologies provide students with a platform to craft work they can share with a broader audience. Without having to develop advanced design and coding skills, students can focus on creating great content that can start wider conversations.
12. On The Run
When the filter's fully closed you typically won't hear anything much, apart from perhaps an occasional bassy thump (awesome for doubling up osc's to make HUGE bass). In between you get the raw sound of the oscillator(s) with some of the brashness removed. And, of course, it almost goes without saying that you don't have to leave the filter at one single position. That's ow the "acid" sound is made, By tweaking.
me: Those promises don’t carry over to Moms you know.
I also have discovered through conversation with him that other women in the complex have benefited from his services and he has complained to me that he feels “they are using him”. So I see what he is up to and while I do appreciate his help, I will only accept it if I can pay him b/c he is the type of guy that does things for women he is attracted to and then complains later when he doesn’t get anything in return. So I have decided to keep things clean and pay him each and every time he helps me.
Oh life, why do you leave us?
The Sun Never Sweats
To review a case study on this issue, presented to the Public Relations Society of America Educator’s Academy in 2003, see The Impact of Public Relations Roles and Dominant Coalitions on Crisis Communications.
400g tin of chickpeas, rinsed and drained
but despite the size of my words
So this year, I really want my birthday to be all about helping others. Instead of asking for gifts, I’m asking friends, family and fans to consider donating $17 for my 17th birthday to help make a change.”
Hi everyone! Thank you all for reading this diversity series! I hope you've enjoyed the different perspectives that have been given - not only from authors but even a YA librarian and my very own wonderful agent. So today we continue the series with one of my favorite authors, Dia Reeves.
“The Pakistan nation will not allow the boots on our ground, never,” Mr. Malik said in an interview with Reuters. “Our government is already cooperating with the U.S. — but they also must respect our sovereignty.”
Personally, I would recommend that everyone try to make at least one yeast bread at home. Odds are that it won't come out perfect the first time but will be delicious anyway. There is a certain satisfaction to making homemade bread and the aroma seems to summon everyone to the kitchen for that first warm slice with butter. Once you get the hang of it you will wonder why you were ever intimidated by bread making. It probably won't be exactly like bakery breads (they have expensive equipment and experienced bakers) but the results can be delicious, healthier and easier on the wallet. What is better than good honest homemade bread?
Say it with me now!
After Jewell got to meet Heather, we went and got into line to see Reggie Bannister. I wanted to meet him because I got to see / ran a film he was in at my festival called Walking Distance (the film has since been picked up by Lionsgate and is now known as Psychic Experiment) and wanted to tell him how much I enjoyed his performance. We met a few more people like the lovely P.J. Soles and Ginger Lynn and then, when Jewell got into like for Roddy Piper, I went over and met the amazing Zoe Bell, a Kiwi stunt performer who doubled Lucy Lawless in Xena, Uma Thurman in the Kill Bill flicks, and herself in Death Proof among others.
level
My father is a bully. He is controlling and domineering. I thought he had changed. I guess it was only a matter of time.
On Thursday, the Olympic Torch came through our area carried for 300 metres by John Stanton, a gentlemen from Edmonton, Alberta, who founded "The Running Room" located throughout North America.
The Night of Nights
That’s right, it’s come to this,
Sizzix: Snowflakes Embossing folder.
If you read my last post you know I caught the Kitchenaid on fire making challah. I want to make more challah. Freshly baked challah smells heavenly. I tried making it by hand the week after I killed the appliance. The recipe called for 7 cups of flour but it was so sticky I kept adding more flour and ended up with at least 14 cups. It was hard to knead by hand and the texture from the cooked bread showed it.
Preheat oven to 350 degrees F, setting a rack in the middle of the oven.
He also reminded PM Lee that Singaporeans are not against ALL foreign workers, but specifically against the intake of PMETs to compete with them for jobs:
The two main objections to the principle of uniformity are:
Jessica loudly cleared her throat and then sighed.
What's my favorite word? That would be ANGEL.
“We live every day waiting for the day where we can live our lives. Waiting for our bank accounts or children to grow, for the economy to get better, for the opportunity to be everything we want to be while being nothing in the process. We waste a lifetime trying to produce a product of merit, trying to find a way to shove a part of ourselves worthy of fame to the surface in some form or another so it can hang on a wall, be kept on a bookshelf or be quoted by another nobody with nothing original to say. Time ticks on and we become obsessively aware that we have not yet shit out a masterpiece, that no one will display our fingernail clippings in The Louvre.”
Why isn’t Africa, or Asia, or the Middle east a “melting pot”. If all this diversity and multiculturalism is so good, why are we keeping it for ALL and ONLY White countries?
the setter pieces apart and inspect your work. Snaps
I hope when they look into it, they see not only a refection of now, but the possibility of what can be.
2. You need an efficient administration who help out the local populace that is not hostile to you or at least refrains from shooting you. Build hospitals, wells, treat the sick kids for free, build good will.
10. Optional Closing Prayer
Am I working any less hard than usual? Nope. Am I trying to perform poorly? Certainly not. Is there an obvious reason why my performance isn’t quite up to the standard I want it to be? Not that I can think of.
But I'm digressing.. we went outside. To escape the suffocation.
Somebody told me you should live every moment of your life
Sleuthfest is coming up next week, and I’ll be joining Heather Graham, Diane Gilbert Madsen and James R. Benn for a panel discussion led by Philip Cioffari. We’ll talk about different mystery genres and I’m to represent cozies. Already I feel a bit of an impostor because my books tend to span several genres. Publisher’s Weekly called them cozy/thriller hybrids, and I think that’s a fair assessment.
A grand and epic story that tells the story of Spain’s civil war, Madrid in the Second World War and reveals a world of war, glamour, espionage and passion.
I've checked out the blogs I follow and looked specifically for the newest bloggers on the block - because it is my view that when starting out on this blogging thing, you need all the encouragement you can get :) So, in no particular order, here are my nominations for this award:
who likes liquid sunshine.
Source : Everyday Osho (365 Daily Meditations For The Here And Now) Pg 173
I met this really dumb girl who were so pathetic, that I just had to write a song about people who needs to get it together, and get it fuckin’ going. Later, when I bumped into this goofball, which I’m sure was her boyfriend, I had it all. I was totally stoked when I got the chorus together, so I spend my night, pissed out of my mind, running all over town, screaming the chorus at people. I think it was Christmas 2006.
1892—Mae Wilkey’s sweet next-door neighbor, Pauline, is suffering from old age and dementia and desperately needs family to come help her. But Pauline can’t recall having kin remaining. Mae searches through her desk and finds a name—Tom Curtis, who may just be the answer to their prayers.
...only the lowly black jelly beans are in the bottom of the basket, left to sit and harden over a year's time until they are tossed when the Easter baskets are pulled out of storage again. That's if they are lucky.
each and every day
MULTICULTURAL NARRATIVE HORIZONS
So for all of you who are waiting, I pray for you. His timing is perfect. He is there for each of us. So hang on a little longer and see what blessings He will bring you!
Luna didn’t have to turn around to identify the man who had interrupted Grosso. She listened to his songs often enough to have his voice imprinted in her brain and in several other body parts, too. But she had never met Leo Drake. She doubted more than a handful of his closest friends, and maybe his worst enemies, had ever seen his face. By Pre-Chaos law, ciguapas had to cover their eyes in public. For anyone who looked into the dark green gaze of a land siren would be enthralled to do the creature’s bidding. And Leo Drake went beyond eye covering. He wore sunglasses, and used his long living hair to craft a mask of thin braids around his face. Luna didn’t know
So I got the Michael Jackson Experience game for christmas, and I finally got a chance to give it go. Its not normally my type of game (not much of a dancer lols) but it's fantastic! it's a great game! played it for over 2 hours.
I do not know why vote-catching gimmicks remind me of a mousetrap in which the poor creature, if it falls for the bait, is gone for good. It may be my psychic problem but the fact remains the elections are getting both hysterical and theatrical. The hype and hoopla associated with this momentous event in the life of the nation ends up recreating the atmosphere of a circus show or carnival.
It's Saturday night and I just got back from the park with my dog. It's become a ritual this summer, walking my dog at the park on Saturday nights and listening to the free bluegrass concerts. The band tonight had one of the very best mandolin players I've ever heard. (Keeping in mind I used to play mandolin in a bluegrass band way way back when, I know a good one when I hear one!) The guitar player was also very good, as was the fiddle player. Individually, they were some of the best musicians I've heard in a long time. However, they just weren't connecting with their audience.
The diagnosis and therapy for hand eczema are complicated because more than a single process is frequently interested. Thus, dyshidrotic eczema, allergic contact dermatitis, and scabies are often complicated by the concomitant presence of either the itch-scratch cycle (atopic dermatitis) or irritant contact dermatitis resulting from soap and water exposure. With so many processes occurring at once, it is easy to witness why many clinicians give up trying to sort out the individual processes responsible for the jam and simply notice it “hand eczema.”
I liked Lissa, she was really caring towards everyone around her, and had good intentions. Sometimes you'd get annoyed by those goody-two-shoes characters, but I Lissa was different.
Uhm. And especially the satisfaction that came while watching it. Something to remember.
I'd been spiritually dead for quite a while, so when the Hindu goddess, Saraswati came to me one night I couldn't have been more surprised. I am not Hindu, nor do I know any people who are Hindu, but as sure as I am breathing, I am sure the form chosen by The Divine that night was the Goddess Saraswati.
"I think," you say to yourself, "that I'm going to take a picture, every day, for the entire year."
40. Is your name Gellete? cuz your the best a man can get.
Oh joy, 1st day with the car and he could not get it to start in the morning....
-2 cups couscous
I want to have the maximum exposure and search engine optimization as possible.
Just for a week,
Believe me when I say so
Flowers, Brads, Gems, Pins, Leaf & Buttons: From My Stash
Take, for example, a New York Times Book Review of A Futile and Stupid Gesture: How Doug Kenney and National Lampoon Changed Comedy Forever, by Josh Karp, which appeared a couple of Sundays ago. The reviewer, Virginia Heffernan, a television critic, body slammed this book. Not only does she hate the book, but from the review it appears that she also hates National Lampoon's brand of slap-stick comedy. The majority of her review addressed her low opinion of the kind of comedy National Lampoon spawned, which she credits for spreading the ubiquity of panty raids, toga parties, and date-rape culture. I could get really worked up about these ridiculous statements - but I won't. I'll just ask why Virginia Heffernan, who obviously has no love or appreciation for this type of comedy, reveiwed this book!* Hmm, NYTBR? And why, NYTBR, did you chose to print this horrible review, when you could have printed a different, less ridiculous, and better informed review by a reviewer who actually liked the book they read?
You can submit questions and comments during the chat or ahead of time, if you’d like. Even now. Meantime, have a lovely rest of your weekend! (Not worrying about YOUR live chat.) L.
Chad Troutwine, Co-founder and CEO of Veritas Prep, Producer, “Freakonomics”
I had a book-signing yesterday at my hometown library, Hawkes Library in West Point, Georgia, and it was the stuff dreams are made of . . . surprise sightings of old friends, reconnections with former teachers, introductions to amazing people . . . the works. The librarian had even taken the time to find books I checked out as a child, showing me check-out cards containing my scrawled signature.
whips and writhes, a skinned snake in reluctant servitude to the blood shot eye that roams left to right, expands and contracts within the shifting light
Either I’m in a good mood today, or this book has no cons!
That pre-ordained time of marriage cannot be avoided. Explain this to your soul.
Continuing on with our well-dressed tour of The Help cast, we arrive at Emma Stone. It takes guts to wear a bright red dress with a giant bow beside your head as a redhead, but she pulled it off superbly. This awards season has been a little hit or miss for her, so it was nice to see her looking so happy and put together at this event.
In the mid 1930s, before the Pearl Harbor attack, the Japanese:
Each of our spouses, our teammates, our kids are different and unique. We need one another. That not only creates balance and variety which is fun, but can also create challenges which are fun-ky. Talk about and celebrate these differences. You will learn to see others not as exact opposites to be endured, but perfect complements to be enjoyed.
They jemmied the sliding door, and took my bilum. In which was my wallet, containing some money, not much. But the REAL piss off is that it contained all my cards.
reneged upon. This caused a scandal and Board of Directors promised
I am not scared, because life seems to sort itself out without my input. I am, however, frustrated, simply because I don’t know where to start.
According to the Electric Universe theory as proposed by Thunderbolts scientists, solar flares and photon waves are changing the fabric of our very reality and have a powerful effect on our cells, causing our cellular memories to awaken and clear.
In the early 1980s, I was obsessed with tropical islands and was visiting the Caribbean nearly every winter. Often, I would island hop, traveling to two islands in one trip on a 10-day vacation.
The plant can be used to make paper, biofuels, clothing, lotions and other products.
".. one of the things they've been doing over the past few months is laying a few stink bombs around Whitehall, and maybe some of them knew that and didn't want to be there when they went off"
This months featured events are:
When you’re deranged
Arrgghh....I hate it when you make assumptions about people. I'm not dating him, he's only a friend and his parents are really nice. Oh and he has 4 brothers. I always said to myself that whenever I marry, my hubby's going to have to have kids or otherwise my kids won't have any aunts or uncles. (I don't have siblings...) Not like I'm marrying anytime soon...don't get me wrong here. :)
In my opinion Brewdog have earnt the right (to use an Americanism): 'run their mouths' because the beers they are producing are world class & get people talking about great beer isn't that what WE ARE ALL ABOUT?
9. Smoke On The Water 9:49
That in no way His powers are limited, He is the Creator.
Where yer friends don't tote a gun
Attack Watch flings Suave down and dares WTF to come after him.
Bake in preheated oven for 50 to 55 minutes, or until set and golden. May be served warm or chilled.
Live as if everything you do will eventually be known. Mostly because it will be…..
Body of Christ, be my salvation.
We had our heart set on a westie
leather strip. As a reminder, I’ve circled
My son nodded at each item, then threw them all on his desk and went off to play with his mates.
Obviously, Malaysians who voted for change would not take an UMNO-instigated coup lying down. Just imagine the students’ uprising alone. The reaction from an increasingly vocal youth guarantees the failure of a coup and the UMNO’s everlasting disgrace, should they continue to bulldoze their way through in complete disregard for the people’s wishes.
Here's the breakdown:
And here we are again.
8. Click the Network tab and make sure that only the servers you want to relay are listed under “Receive mail from remote servers that have these IP addresses.” If you still have the full IP range listed the server will be an Open Relay at this point.
One song.
HELLO!!!!!
The Area 15 Family Care Council will share information with families and accept new members.
He chases them into the woods, where Natalie and Brenda somehow get split up. When Natalie realizes that Brenda is no longer with her, she stops running and hears her screaming somewhere in the distance. Natalie hears Paul getting closer, and manages to flag down a pickup truck, which happens to be driven by the creepy janitor. Despite her unease around the guy, Natalie accepts a ride from him.
At first, to me, blogging feels like your talking to someone in a coma. Just laying there, eyes closed, and you are asking yourself...are they listening or am I really just talking to myself? Are they comforted or am I just comforting myself? Now, these feelings might also be validated by the fact that I have only ONE follower and no, it's not my mom or dad (nice try, i'm not a complete blogging disappointment that only my family would take an interest in my new project alright?)....ok fine, it's my sister.
The second news, and you tell me if it's disappointing: despite its release date and other details of its pedigree - not least of which is location photography in the New Jersey woods, right in the same area where F13 was being shot around the same time - Mother's Day just refuses to let itself be a slasher film, even in the funky way of some early examples of the form where they were still working the kinks out of the formula. To tell the truth, I am not certain that I can even pinpoint which if any specific subgenre the film belongs to: pretty much all of the opening 40 minutes certainly make it seem like it's going to be a nice straightforward slasher, and then it suddenly makes a dodge in the direction of ripping off pseudo-slasher The Texas Chainsaw Massacre, spends an exhausting and protracted scene acting like it's going to be an extraordinarily early example of the torture porno, before a final act that I honestly don't know how to quantify at all: it's somewhat of a rape-revenge story in the Last House on the Left vein, but that doesn't fit terribly well, either. It's sort of alarming that a horror film from 1980, particularly one as magnificently cheap as Mother's Day, could manage to spend so much of its running time keeping ahead of me, and I don't even think it's because director Charles Kaufman and his co-writer Warren Leight were trying to be sneaky: it's more likely the case that the filmmakers didn't know they were breaking any rules simply because the rules didn't quite exist at that point. It would take the subsequent decade of chintzy American horror to set up all the strict rules that Mother's Day never plays by, and thus it is, oddly, more transgressive now than it would have been when it was new.
(Remember: We were not called to be loved but to love. John 15:12 “This is My commandment, that you love one another as I have loved you.” Matt 10:22. Mar 13:13, & Luk 21:17 “And you will be hated by all for My name’s sake.” Speaking out in love often results in more than not being loved, and this for many people is the hardest part of witnessing. Are you ready to love, despite being hated for it?)
Advice: At least record these inspirations, for Spirit is speaking to you about how you might fulfill your purpose and contribute to the healing of theplanet.
This is a picture I took in Early May last year, when spring was just beginning. All the trees were green and flowers were had by all.
I am sorry to say that I went for the foie gras (£11.60). I'm sorry because I know how unethical this stuff is and as someone who refuses to eat anything but free range, high welfare chicken, it is incredibly hypocritical of me to eat foie gras. Having said that, I love it. I have no excuse for ordering it and I have no clever argument for eating it. I had considered leaving it out of this review, just to avoid the potential backlash, but I probably deserve the backlash so here it is. I'll apologise now for the state of the pictures...
On this fine and sunny Saturday, my lovely wife and I took our daughter and my wife’s mother (my suegra…which is Spanish for mother-in-law), who was visiting us from northern Virgina, to the healthy market (known locally as the Mercado Saludable) that appears every Sabado in our district of La Molina.
Yet at the same time there are millions of kids, just like them,
until next time lovelies...
Next week we have that bullshit reunion show. I guess I have to watch that too, fuck.
1) Seeking refuge with Allah against the traps of the devils.
In the complaint, Ms. Noel alleges that former Tax Attorney Supervisor Arthur Mason said: “IPG is a difficult place to work. It is obvious that black employees are treated differently. It will be difficult to move up within the company. … Maybe you should consider employment elsewhere.”
When last you heard from me, I was on Kauai and it was three months ago. A few weeks before that, I mused about being still in America, as opposed to back in Tanzania. I really did expect to go back to Tanzania sometime around July, then October, then March of this year. But now that March has come and gone, it's time to admit to myself that I'm not going back in the foreseeable future.
they occupied an apartment on the third floor.
-Santino chant off the bat.
The south will also have to face up to its own internal ethnic rivalries and resolve a bitter dispute with the north over the ownership of the central Abyei region.
Like many of the movies I already have plans to review, I first saw In the Line of Fire as a video release before we put it to rent at my family’s video store sixteen years ago. I liked it, but was not as hip to it as I am now that I have seen it a couple more times in the interim. Back then, I paid little attention to Clint Eastwood’s Frak Horrigan’s long held guilt over his failure to save JFK--ho, hum. Not another JFK bit!--and focused on John Malkovich’s portrayal of the psychotic ex-CIA assassin Mitch Leary, which I negatively and naively found wanting in comparison with Hannibal Lector.
(i will be sharing a few more pictures of this bedroom later in the week.)
There was further inspiration from a recipe of Nigel Slater's I saw not so long ago combined with a conversation with my mum about chorizo the other day.
Mr. and Mrs. John Smith invite you to…
So I set up this little Minibeast playscape and added a back mirror to give the children a different view of whilst they explore it. I also added a magnifying glass!
As odd as it was, I still liked it. It's pretty fun since the gore is wonderfully cheap and the corny music is awesomely repetitive. Monstrosity is worth looking into but only if you're very curious and a weirdo in love. 5/10.
I have been dealing with the oh so glorious back problems again. I went back to the pain management doctor the week of Thanksgiving and had injections in my spine again. He got the right nerve this time and aside from the pain during the procedure, I felt no pain. That was the best night of sleep I had in years. I was pain free in that area for 3.5 weeks, which is amazing. The only thing that caused the pain to start again was that I tried beginners yoga at a retreat and the stretching/twisting caused me to aggravate that area. I wasn't too worried though because I have prescription pain killers to help with the pain. I don't take them near as often as I'm allowed to, mainly because I don't want to be dependent on them to deal with the pain. I try to wait till it hurts pretty bad or I sense it will be getting bad soon, and then I'll take medicine. I just hate the idea of being dependent on medication to feel better.
born and raised here, 'tis true
The first part of the blog hop is you must leave a creative comment on each of the following blogs:
40And he seemed to them to be right: and they sent for the Apostles, and, after having them whipped and giving them orders to give no teaching in the name of Jesus, they let them go.
On Saturday whilst I should have been catching up with my beauty sleep I was hot footing it to Borough to tout my wares at Sainsbury's Great British Beer Hunt. I don't know many brewers entered the competition but only eight or nine companies turned up at the promotional event. I was a little apprehensive as I'd heard there were going to be 200 punters for the tasting and I was expecting something like when the wrong door gets opened in a zombie film and a shambling mob lurches in.
It is with great excitement that I introduce to you the Return on Disability® Rating.
I have always been fanatical about business learning and self development and so I have combined all my experience and learning into Impetus and aim to really break some ground in providing what we do. Whilst I do not intend to focus on our market strengths as such in this blog, it will be unavoidable in some circumstances. What I do aim to do however is enable people to follow the journey with me. I will also provide an opportunity to interact and to comment and of course this means that this journey will truly be shared as opposed to being one dimensional or directional. I will also provide an opportunity to ask questions and wherever possible, I will answer truthfully.
Hae Ra can’t stop crying and Jin Oh tries to comfort her. He’s sure that Hae Ra’s mom will come around if they stay strong. She wonders why he won’t consider running away with her. She’s worried that if they stay apart, the more likely he won’t be able to return to her.
Facebook or Twitter~ I detest both (and have neither!), but I guess Twitter is the lesser of two evils, I just don't see the point of it unless you're a celebrity.
King: I am not scared of you.
If there are some 3rd party apps that you download from the app store that crash, you expect it. But when the installed apps start crashing - that is just sloppiness. I have seen multiple crash on the default apps - most of them on the Android market application. This should not be happening.
the worst is yet to come
In college, I shared a dorm room with a total stranger, Beth from Seattle. She was a slender girl with a cloud of red curls and a background in cheer and dance. Beth decorated her half of the dorm room with ballet posters featuring images of disintegrating pointe shoes and little girls in technicolor tutus. Intrigued, I asked her to show me some ballet. She assumed first position and began a series of plies. I was absolutely enchanted. She moved like a dream. Her motions were liquid and graceful, yet full of strength. She probably ended after only a few plies, embarrassed by my gawking, but I only remember her endless smooth bends and proud carriage. It didn’t take me long to learn that our school had a beginning ballet class. I enrolled in my first class, that winter, at eighteen.
I couldn't get the boys to slow down to take their picture. Between the bounce house and their friends, they really didn't want anything to do with me or my camera!
The older you get, the older Gramma gets.
She is bitter, she is hurt, she is crying on the inside.
young artists to thank them for letting them know about the case since the
This is the crème de la crème of cocoa.
Saturday-30 minute run training (20 minutes); 1 min 30 sec plank
The warmth and joy of Christmas, brings us closer to each other."
--Your religion is the one "true" religion, and everyone else is fucked.
By Steve Milloy
So, off we set to our ever-growing list of spotted wildlife, which to date includes The various Fish, Shellfish, Seals, Sheep, Goats, Deer, Skuas, Cormorants and Gulls that I have already blogged about. But also Geese, Jackdaws, Herons and far too many blackbirds. Some of these I grant are less than exotic, but I cannot recall a holiday where the wildlife has been in so much abundance. There are still a few more spots to come in future blogs, the list is not complete yet. But, I digress, we headed out to sea once again, and spotted (And captured on film this time) many of the creatures we had seen the previous week, although this time, because of the high tide, the seals were in the water.
In order to motivate the people of the United States to give up their guns, the Jesuits stage shootings periodically to show how "dangerous" guns are.
Congratulations. You successfully got through four years of college without having an 8 a.m. class (every student’s dream). Now you are going to make up for lost time and be at work by 8 a.m. every morning. Employers notice those who are on time and those who straggle in late. Don’t be the latter.
I Forgive You
Ehem. Call in with your opinions if you should feel so inclined. Remember to reference the point in question, because there will be many. I golfed a lot. A lot.
On the other hand, we can hope that more people will come to realize that we are losing much and gaining only things of very dubious value at best. It's time to try to preserve the best of our traditions, and if that means we have to do so only by doing so in a less public setting, then that's what we must do. The public sphere is now firmly in the grasp of the cultural Marxists, and they have shown a zero tolerance policy for anything that is not 'diverse and multicultural.'
SCELIONID WASP
I loved mood rings. I even loved those weird "Hypercolor" t-shirts that were so popular for a while in the early 90s. So when I found Mood Mud I immediately coveted it. They have the texture of a stress ball but change colour depending on the temperature of your skin.
Remember “Morning in America” (mourning?) when “greed is good” pealed like church bells? Reaganomics was born that morning. Even after decades of wealth gushing ever upward, hardly any of it ever seems to trickle back down. Imagine that, shucks, the whole concept sounds so…Reagan. Millions of fossil Americans can still get misty at any mention of “Dutch”.
With any luck, the Mansion will last us thirty to fifty more years before another major renovation is needed. We blew our chance to acquire “Woodland” and Texans are probably too cheap to ever want to build a new Mansion. So what will we do? Maybe we can build an underground extension the way they did at the Capitol. Or who knows, maybe we can move the Governor, the Legislature, and all the various Boards, Departments, and Agencies into the Old Dell Place–it should be for sale by then.
Right now, YouTube is producing a slew of new "channels." They have a decidedly familiar ring to them: sitcoms, sports, scripted series, celebrity showcases. Although the long-promised convergence of the web and TV has not yet arrived there is one thing we can deduce from YouTube's effort -- no one wants TV to be more like the web. They want the web to be more like TV.
...1987, leaning against my backpack on a traffic island outside Rome, my friend and I taking turns sticking our thumbs out, heading down to Pompeii to touch ancient history, admire ancient mosaics, and wander around the place Pink Floyd played....he asked if I wanted to read a book he had...An Introduction to Zen Buddhism, by D. T. Suzuki....thoroughly uninterested in Eastern philosophy, meditation, spirituality, or any of that kinda crap, I was, nonetheless, just bored enough to say yeah, sure....a lot’s happened since then....I meditate every day and recently dug out my old Alan Watts (purchased some time after returning from Europe in ’87 or ’88)...but still have no interest in being a Buddhist...
The source of my dreams became clear when I got to lounge. The floor was covered in Beatles records and empty bottles of Stella. Three fat cigar stumps had been extinguished in our Jesus ashtray. My brother, Schwodler, and no doubt others had enjoyed a night cap, which I had been oblivious to. I opened the door to the balcony to clear the smell of smoke, as I tried to piece the previous evening together. It was our end of season-do, that much I knew; but other questions remained unanswered: did Joe Hill pursue Lee Fielder's sister any further? Had Greg Baker made his early morning flight to Senegal with Arsenal's Johan Djourou? Just what exactly did Sam Schwodler have against sobriety? And, what was that substance daubed across the fly of Ryan Jones' trousers?
Four large commercial fans and an imposing dehumidifier whirred noisily, drying the carpet, and the furniture was disarranged (a bit of a plumbing disaster having dispersed large quantities of water on part of the floor) in the lower level room in which I normally take my evening snack and visit my virtual haunts. Gloomy machine drone and disorder denying us our wont, Nelson and I took to the library (in which my beloved noir charcoal hangs and Nelson has posed fetchingly for a journal post). Nelson parked expectantly beside his filled water bowl, on the rug, and I deposited my coffee, a glass of milk and one of those huge and ridiculously over-frosted and sprinkle-adorned cupcakes that Costco sells on the small table next to the chair in which I planned to install myself, handed Nelson his Milkbone and selected, almost instinctively, from one of the bookshelves Margaret Forster's Daphne du Maurier: The Secret Life of the Renowned Storyteller. Since first reading the book a few years ago, I have returned to it, a few pages or a chapter at a time, often – not because Daphne du Maurier is my favorite author (as regular readers might know, Cornell Woolrich holds that distinction) but because I identify strongly with the Rebecca writer's violence of emotion, revealed in the Forster book through a sampling of du Maurier's correspondence with her close (and ever-unattainably distant) friend, Ellen Doubleday, wife of the English novelist's US publisher.
Next day, we start again. The weekend looks similar except replace the work with taking care of parents who are both in wheelchairs (from what I believe are diet related problems!) and during the school year, you'd add in taking Nora and Joe to at least 15 things a week, including dance practice, volunteering, a musical he's in, etc. I love summer!
09/02/2011 BUY 0.01 eurgbp 0.87695 10/27/2011 0.88034 +5.44
2. Get as many of your friends, family and other dog-lovers to go to Help Find Monty and LIKE his page too AND then they need to write YOUR NAME on Monty’s wall! (They need to tell us who sent them there.. otherwise how will we keep track of your LIKES?)
I want to believe that anything is possible.
malt & fermentables
I hear all the time from women: but I don’t want to get big and build lots of muscles. I just want to lose fat. Ladies! The difference between a man’s potential to build muscle and a woman’s is HUGE! You will not look like Arnold! You will burn more calories at rest, which means being able to go harder, longer and having a more metabolically active body for the rest of your life.
So, what about ThetaHealing® Manifesting and Abundance class…? I know some of you may be thinking “well, with these clearings I don’t need the class”. I would offer that you do. Why? Because of the way your brain is wired. The intent of this clearing and the downloads of these truths was to help those of you who are beginning to notice that you are automatically, without conscious thought, manifesting. Some will take it the next step and begin to try to manifest intentionally. That can be intoxicating. It can also he hazardous. The brain loves a “process” – a “roadmap”. In ThetaHealing®, we first teach the brain how to allow you to go to and be in the theta brainwave. Then, we teach you how to use that energy to impact healings and positive change. The next step in that process is conscious manifesting. The Manifesting and Abundance class teaches a process that the brain can use to know when you intend to manifest and to help make it happen. Yes, that’s right – teaching your brain how to help you manifest what you want. You don’t have to do this haphazardly. Make the choice to teach your brain that you are safe and that this is fun and that it can help you. You will do what is right for you. Of that, I am certain. Why not take what these clearings provide you and manifest the means and resources to take the class. That sounds perfect to me!
It was this incident, together with the explanation it entailed, that was responsible for bringing the whole affair to the attention of the public. When we went to the police station to collect Mr. McScribe, an overenterprising reporter was present; and that evening the story, embellished with lurid details, appeared in his paper. The result was that the next morning representatives of every newspaper in the city descended upon us.
The American Institute of Cancer's most recent press release (Nov. of 2007) reports clear evidence that excess body-weight drastically increases the risk of most cancers.
Fresh Fish, Baked in Sea Salt
our spirit continues to exist in the
Bob’s (our dear Robert Held) birthday is once again upon us…..he turns 63 on March 3rd! (c’mon, he doesn’t look a day over 30! – tee hee) We threw an early, low-key celebration here at our offices for Bob with cupcakes and champagne. Sooooooo Yummmyyyyyyyy.
Until recently, I noticed that the owner of the Turkish bakeshop where I normally go for freshly baked bread, talks to me like we were long lost friends. Sometimes, he would offer Hubby and I to have real Turkish coffee with him. Whenever I am with friends, my friends get a small box of baklava for free. He said, he likes having me around because my laughter makes him happy. lol
Greetings! I hope your weekend is starting off well - and glad you're starting your Saturday here! This week I'm the hostess for the Our Creative Corner challenge again, and I have a color challenge for you: Pool Party, Chocolate Chip, Old Olive, Cajun Craze, plus a light neutral. I wanted a combination that would make pretty fall cards, but use it for anything that strikes your fancy!
Q:�Seriously! What can I do for these Crow's feet and all those wrinkles on my face?
Sorry I didn't get any after pictures. It was gone in no time flat. I hope you enjoy it like we did!!
I was visiting Nashville a couple of years ago when I learned that Henderson had a regular gig at the Bluebird Café. Though it’s tucked into an unassuming suburban strip mall, the Bluebird is sacred ground for Nashville’s songwriting community. I was curious to see what sort of act a veteran bluegrass picker and session musician would bring to such an intimate venue.
Still, Ms. Hoyle said the costs could have been greater. As part of the city’s efforts before the appeals court, it prevailed on the notion that the hiring of 21 additional firefighters, something contemplated during the proceedings, was not justified.
7am: up and having coffee sitting outside on our bedroom deck
Although a comic novel there’s a darkness beneath it especially with menacing figures like Carl, how much of this came from your own experience of school days and the adolescent ‘jungle’? I went to secondary school in the 1990s, which though it wasn’t that long ago chronologically feels, from this vantage, almost prehistoric. So many interesting things have happened since then – the internet, the war on terror, mobile phones, X-Factor – and I wanted to write about those things. For all their supposed privilege, I think in some ways the kids in Skippy have a harder time than my generation did. Their world is so much more mediated, the forces of capitalism have a much tighter stranglehold on them so they have even more impossible expectations to try and fail to live up to. Compared to now, my time in school was quite benign. Certainly, it was a jungle, and there were large, terrifying creatures with BO lurking around every corner. But if you were fast, you could outrun them. How can you outrun Facebook?
We've been here before on Bristling Badger, and I've no doubt we'll have to revisit it in future, but here we go again. The government's own figures show that unemployed people outnumber the available jobs 5:1.
It’s time for a new star to shine.
* Even though kids with Down syndrome have some things that are different from you, they're mostly the same as you. (I asked them things like, "Do you like to play ball? So does Micah!")
“Barack Obama” was prepping to step out as a political candidate!!
While these tender, pressed cookies require extra care when storing, they freeze very well when stacked between layers of waxed paper. This makes them top considerations for holiday baking, school bake sales or church functions because they can be made ahead and frozen until the day you need them. As the name implies, the Mirro Cookie-Pastry Press isn't just for cookies. It also makes canapes, appetizers, cheese straws, crackers, meringue shells, cream puffs, eclairs and ladyfingers. If you have one of these overlooked kitchen gadgets sitting around, go ahead and pull it out; see how many smiles you can create!
* Keep in mind that smartphones like iPhones and Blackberrys with 3G, 4G, etc. can emit spikes of radiation frequently, not just when you're talking on them.
Several towns named in the video… we need to watch these ring epicenters in NY for the threat of receiving severe weather (hail, damaging winds, and possible tornadoes)… usually this occurs within 24-48 hours of the “HAARP rings” appearing.
+The Emptiness Of Nothingness
Best Champion of Bloggers + Tweeters: The incredibly wonderful and supportive @wilkravitz of the Vampire Wonderland blog who comments on all my blog posts and frequently recommends me to people. Come to London Billy, I'll buy you a beer!
I wanted to see what would happen if I put an entire box cake mix into my 7" round. One box mix is too small for my 8" round and too big for my 6" round. I was hoping 7" would be juuuust right.
Summer isn’t here yet, but where we live it is already swimming weather. This is cause for jubilant celebration by Pudding Pie - splashing around in the pool is her number one favorite activity. I love to swim too, I just wish I had more time to find where I’ve mislaid my bathing suit body. I'm still encased in a fair amount of those winter pounds, and they don't go well with the bathing suit.
-1/2 cup parmesan cheese
Holy Crap, what was that?
I am really thrilled both our sons like to cook. They take after both their dad and me. I think the more we prepare our own foods, the more we eat healthfully. When our oldest was four, we sent him to Rutgers' Nutritional Science Preschool in part to reinforce our home's healthy eating habits. I buy whole wheat bread, soy milk and unsugared cereal. I regularly substitue turkey for red meat and turkey bacon for regular bacon. When I bake bread, I use whole wheat flour and I bake cookies and breads with locally produced honey, not sugar. I avoid buying dairy products because I am allergic and Lucas, 12, is seriously lactose intolerant. (When he was a toddler, an ingestion of milk gave him so much pain I had to take him to the emergency room.)
You can get Vietnamese subs, shawarma, Asian-fusion, Ukrainian pierogies (who knew that spell check doesn’t know what a pierogi is!?), pulled-pork sandwiches, BBQ – seriously the list, like Rip van Winkle’s beard, grows ever long.
If a woman responds to your question - do not believe it, if silent - do not believe it even more.
Some days don't go how you expect.
They are the ‘officials’ so they must be right and the willing media then create their stories around the so called truth they are told by these ‘officials’ like Christian Halto.
She's probably a little spoiled, but we like spoiling her. I like buying her new clothes and a new little toy in the store if I know she's going to absolutely love it! It makes me happy to do those things. She sometimes decides that she wants to cry out or throw a temper, but that's not because of a lack of discipline and consistency on our parts; she's just being a toddler. But, if we were in a store and someone witnessed her (random) temper tantrum, they'd think she was a brat...or that we didn't have her under control...or that we were doing *something* wrong.
Larry Silverstein, Bernard Maddoff’s counterpart in the controlled demolition of WTC towers, was so confident of his mafia protection, he even admitted to having the WTC Bldg # 7 “pulled.” He knew no one could touch him, and no one so far has!
Operating system: Windows 7 Starter
That is subtly done. I am not sure whether it is strictly inaccurate, but it is suggestive enough to make it sound as though the council decides whether those conditions are fulfilled. It goes on to make it clear that that is precisely its conclusion:
More NYFW love. There are some incredible design statements walking the runway. I am loving so many of them, including Jason Wu, J. Crew, rag and bone, Oscar de la Renta, DVF, Parabal Gurung and Christian Siriano. Christian's show was so catching - I love the mix of soft femininity and bold colors as well as his color pairings. I was so inspired by his line, I had to turn it into a room that any small space dweller would love.
Before I jump in to talking about the movie, allow me to share my experience in trying to get a hold of the movie. First, as with The Dead Zone, Firestarter is listed as “Very Long Wait” on my Blockbuster queue and has been ever since I added it back when I started the book. However, this didn’t bother me quite as much as it did last time, as I was armed with my Hasting’s 49¢ rental attack. Unfortunately, Hasting’s did not carry Firestarter. I was kind of upset about this at first, as I didn’t know what I was going to do. I then looked on Amazon and discovered it was available as an instant download there. This was not my most favorite idea, as I don’t particularly like watching movies on my laptop when I have the option of my TV. Of course, with no apparent options for watching it on the TV, I seemed to be out of luck. I considered Netflix, but I had no way of knowing if Firestarter was available in their streaming library or not, as they no longer indicate “how” movies are available to non-members. I didn’t want to waste my two week free trial if the movie wasn’t available. Then I got an idea. I turned on my PlayStation and went to their movie store. And there it was. Firestarter, available as a rental download. I was super excited. It was available right now, and on my TV. The only thing that makes this option not better than Hasting’s is the price. But at $4.50 for the high definition version, it was still better than what I used to pay for movies at Blockbuster before they introduced their new daily prices. I could have opted for the $2.99 standard definition version, and almost did, but the PlayStation store makes you add a minimum of $5 to your wallet. And since I’ve had my PlayStation for almost 3 years now and have until now not had a need to add money to my account…. Chances are that unless I run into another movie issue like this I won’t be purchasing anything from the PlayStation store again. That said, I figured the movie was going to cost me $5 either way, so I opted for the high def version J
As we traveled together on our trip, we frequently found Sweet Daddy waiting for us.
Please share this e-mail with anyone that may voice our concerns. I would also encourage you, others and the general public to attend the Board Meeting this coming Monday, December 13, 2010, at 6:00pm in the ESC. Be sure to sign up to speak to influence Board Members to either amend or “vote down” the above bylaw. This bylaw would allow the President of the Board to abuse his or her authority and have sole censorship authority over who speaks, what is placed on the agenda and what is discussed at future Board Meetings. This holds true even if the board meeting continues or is adjourned and reconvened at a later time or date.
Phreak: Not everyone wants to build AP, Xyph. Some of us want Trinity Forces.
So I finally checked my email this morning and found a message that said "CALL ME IMMEDIATELY" and learned about the problem.
It's been a long time since I've had stage fright. Sure, I get excited and nervous before performing now (I'd say "just ask my band," but they are sworn to secrecy about my back-stage antics before heading out in front of an audience). But sweaty, panicky, knee-and-finger-shaking stage fright? Not for a long time.
It took me a while to get into Zola Jesus, but this one reminds me a lot of Madonna’s Frozen, and not just the video. It has a whole Dead Can Dance thing going on too, but in a very accessible way. I like the percussion, particularly towards the end.
and two tiny paws, a body, a head
dirty is the game I play.
The flavors here are bright and sweet, and the recipe is simple. For the dressing, whisk together 1/2 cup mango juice (I used a mango-peach blend with no added sugar, but I bet you could easily put chopped mango into a blender with water and strain to make your own mango juice), 1 tablespoon fresh lemon juice, 2 tablespoons minced fresh mint, a pinch of clove and a pinch of coriander.
Q. Why is the Higgs particle so difficult to find?
I loved Leyda because it felt new, alive, humble and different there. My favorite wine from them by far was their Syrah; so warm, jammy and spicy. It was splendid with our lunch of paella, cheeses, salads and a special mushroom risotto prepared just for me.
Keep Sweating!
So overall for me Harry Potter wins out with books and movies. Magic themed books and movies has more variety and interest than vampires who are still playing to a certain mold with a few little twists. Of course this is all my opinion. Many friends of mine love the Twilight and think it far superior because vampires are a lot more interesting to them than magic.
And don't you think everyone needs a sign directing them to Le Petit Trianon, Marie Antoinette's beautiful little palace on the grounds of Versaille?
2x Seraph Sanctuary
3 cloves garlic, peeled, crushed and chopped
Tanda Zap invites consumers to “Zap Bullying” and pledge support to this social campaign by visiting its Facebook page, www.Facebook.com/Tanda. ”Like” Tanda and then “Vote” to Zap Bullying. Tanda will donate $1 for each Vote to the STOMP Out Bullying™ organization.
Here is the sketch:
“Our attitude is our producers believe in consumer choice and, if that’s what their consumers want to buy, they’ll produce cage-free eggs for the marketplace provided the customer is willing to pay the additional cost,” said Gene Gregory, president of the United Egg Producers.
“For all of the problems that we have now, we still live in a democracy now and we didn’t then,” he said. “But you can’t avoid the kind of awful analogy that arises in these circumstances.”
And now for something almost entirely different. Set in New York in late 1963, THE IRON WILL OF SHOESHINE CATS is narrated by Russell Newhouse, a young Jewish student of English literature. At the age of 22, Russell is an orphan, having lost his mother at a young age, and his father - a well-known hard-bitten Jewish NYPD cop - more recently.
The Failed is a quick easy read that will please fans of the genre but also contains enough emotion and excitement to reach beyond horror. If you like your fiction to be simultaneously fast paced, touching and terrifying then give it a try.
I lied. Check back tomorrow. Went to the gym, did 2 miles in intervals (yay! I ran!), and completely forgot about the scale.
One European had the following comment on England's conduct with the concentration camps: "Great Britain cannot win her battles without resorting to the despicable cowardice of the most loathsome cure on earth - the act of striking at a brave man's heart through his wife's honour and his child's life."
I never would have thought this would happen to me. As someone with low supply, I never imagined it. Yet, as I lay on the couch the other night, shivering, cold sweats, and a fever- wondering if I was going to vomit....I thought to myself "Could it really be?". I had just nursed Lil Man and had found myself in tears.
Have a great Tuesday, y'all!
Constance Marks’ documentary Being Elmo: A Puppeteer’s Journey is only tangentially concerned with Elmo’s commercially ubiquitous existence. Instead of using the character as a basis, it chronicles the life of the man who brought Elmo to life. The film argues that the love that Elmo puppeteer Kevin Clash experienced through his life is the defining quality of Elmo that would inspire and enrapture the imaginations of children the world over. Marks uses pictures and old camera footage to draw an evocative picture of Clash’s life, from his modest upbringing outside Baltimore, to his dedication to creating and operating puppets. Clash achieved success at a young age due in part to good fortune, but mostly from his commitment to the craft of puppetry and the love and support of his family. It’s standard stuff as movie narratives go, but that is about a man whose fame and influence is known to the world only as Elmo makes it unique. Moreover, to see Clash, his family, and colleagues reflect on his unique fame is richly compelling, mostly because these reflections come across as wholly genuine.
Bring salsa and broth to a boil in a 5- to 6-quart heavy pot over moderately high heat.
It's a place where you can buy figures from other collectors, but of the things that makes it better then places like ebay where people sell their figs, is that here you can see the persons figure collection and any photos they might have taken of their figures.
First, Tanaka’s first title win…
4. I don’t know the identity of the father of my daughter. He drives a BMW that now has a hole made by my stiletto in one of the door panels. Perhaps you can contact BMW service stations in this area and see if he’s had It replaced.
Third course was another fusion dish that blossomed from Japanese roots: Tiger Chawan-mushi, or steamed egg with tiger prawns, and split pea soup on the side. Served in an adorable ceramic box topped by a white bunny!!! Again, loved the attention to detail.
I was OK with that, I just really wanted a bath! As anticipated, everything stopped. I got out and sent a message to the midwives to tell them that things were progressing but I still had a way to go so I was going to bed to rest. Off I went at 10.30pm.
In addition to digital format, “World Kid” is also being released as a multimedia physical songbook, featuring original illustrations for all album tracks by visual artist Rachel June,the short story “Work” by award winning radio producer Andy Mills (NPR, PRX, WBEZ), lyrics, exclusive photos from the making of “World Kid” and full album download code. The limited edition books will see an initial print run of 300 and are only available at the band’s live shows. They make their debut when The Hudson Branch headlines Chicago’s Lincoln Hall on May 8.
I love this shape and will use it across the top of at least one piece I am currently working on, and I'm sure will quickly use it up. Quite a deal for $1.
Transition begins when the addiction starts to cause problems that force the addict to make a new evaluation of the relationship between alcohol and drug use and life problems. At the beginning of this stage most addicted people believe that they are a social drinker or a recreational drug user who is in control. By the end of this stage they recognize that they are addicted and not in control and need to abstain. In between these two points the addict experiences a painful inner conflict between the addictive part of themselves that wants to keep believing they are social drinkers and recreational drug users, and the sober reality-based part of them that believes they are addicted or at least on the road to addiction. There are four major tasks of transition. The first is to develop motivating problems that force addicts to recognize that something is wrong and motivate them to take action. Since, at this stage of recovery, most addicts don’t believe that their problems are related to alcohol or drug use, they attempt normal problem solving designed to solve the life problems caused by their addiction without dealing with the alcohol and drug use that is causing the problems. As this normal problem solving repeatedly fails, they are forced to see the relationship between alcohol and drug use. They can see that their problems are partially the result of drinking and using drugs. They start to see that they are using too much, of the wrong kind, too frequently. This launches most addicts into serious attempts to control chemical use by regulating how much, how often, and what kinds of chemicals they use. Because addiction is a disease marked by loss of control, these attempts fail. These repeated failures to control their use can cause serious demoralization that forces many addicts to accept the need for abstinence. Unfortunately, most addicts try to abstain without help and become overwhelmed by symptoms of physical and psychological withdrawal, social pressures, and an avalanche of problems that were created by their addictive use. These problems don’t end when they stop drinking and drugging; they follow them into sobriety and make it difficult to stay in recovery. When these solo efforts at recovery fail, they realize that they cannot maintain abstinence alone and accept the need for help. At this point many reluctantly and are often resistant to seekinf help in order to solve the immediate problems.
Random thoughts on film shoots: This time of year, it's tough finding a vineyard that still has a decent amount of leaves that aren't brown or about to turn brown. Also, filming pretty much never runs on time. Ever. But it sure beats sitting at a desk all day.
"I was asked to describe my color palette, and I have long described the colors I use in the house as the colors you would see in a dried hydrangea- aged, muted, worn color." - joan
Jack’s thin lips pulled up at the corners. “I’ll do more than try.”
I realized I had done something kind of stupid after having the headset in his ear for more than five minutes the adhesive had hardened - and Mr. Gardner found himself with a earpiece glued into his ear.
When we were young, and we traversed that tunnel, we were seeing something for the first time, and we were also seeing something that the people who discovered Wilmot Creek never saw, nor the people who built the tunnel, because things have changed and their eyes were likely already clouded by the knowledge of life that impinges on all adults. When someone says something and quotes an old philosopher, one may sit back, finished, and marvel at how true it still is today, but one forgets that today is different, and there is more to say. There is always more to say and there is always more to discover.
Problem is, none of this is true. The government’s estimates are still absurdly low. The DND confessed to Mr Page they couldn’t provide a rationale for the figures they gave him. And the government’s own figures for the cost of the plane – made public in the Budget Officer’s report before the election – include both acquisition and operations.
War looms in sixteen-year-old Tris’s dark dystopian world as disputes between the factions grow. Tris must now fight against all odds to discover the truth that can save her and the people she loves. Sides must be chosen, secrets will emerge – and the choices she makes will have devastating and unexpected consequences. From Amazon UK
My Passion: Sewing, modeling, dancing salsa, bachata.
I'm pretty skint at the moment, but I've been desperate to try Illamasqua and I couldn't resist, I've purchased two blushes in Hussy and Tremble, and a nail polish in Jo'Mina. Including postage and packaging it came to £26.75, normally it would have cost me £50, so a brilliant bargain! xx
I just think I might like it a little better if the artwork didn't somehow remind me of Woodstock. It might as well be a tie-dyed peace sign.
The actress and writer Susan Penhaligon - best known for her starring role as Prue in Bouquet of Barbed Wire and for appearances in many other TV dramas such as A Fine Romance - is also a poet (on the quiet).
There are plenty of support staff who do a great job. And when you find one, they are a gem. My brother has had some staff stability in the last few years (since he moved to his new house). For the moment, we have staff who’s concerned about David in a long term basis. We form attachments as a family. We can invite these people to accompany David to family weddings, professional events, etc. And once there is some staff stability we can start talking about things like self determination, using the iPad for communications, going places specific to David’s likes, hopes, dreams.
runtime: 44:51
So because I'm in a "dippy" sort of mood, I figured I'd post another good one. This is practically one of the only dishes I can solidly eat eggplant in. It's goes good with tortilla chips, toasted bread, and even all by itself!
HSN has appointed Nordstrom Inc. veteran Anne Martin-Vachon its chief merchandising officer, effective May 14, the company said Thursday.
The oil and dirt of machines
It isn’t always easy as my ego fights me many days. “Smug” as I call her will say you meditated yesterday, you can take a day off. “Smug” gets me into trouble and I have to say to her sit and stay at bay. After one class I spoke with one of the other students that I had grown to admire. She and I talked about the benefits of the class. We listened more and both had felt the calming effects of meditation. She told me too that all of her life she could read people but she had been recently blocked. She enrolled in the class to unblock this skill of hers and it was working. She specifically said “I read people, I’m a people reader.” For whatever reason that sentence has stayed with me. I am not sure if I want to read people although it would be helpful, I’m sure.
Then Passover came and I felt obligated to post some Vegan version of a holiday favorite so I posted a recipe for Fried Matzo/Matzo Brei. I went through my routine: posted the recipe, had Tom proofread it, fixed the ever-missed spelling error, posted the entry to my Facebook page, added the title to the My "V" Recipes list on the blog and then realized I couldn't do the next step...e-mail it to Shirley. My heart sank. She wouldn't see this recipe, tell me how I was making her eat too much, tell me to write that cookbook. Suddenly, it just wasn't as much fun.
Sounds intense, doesn't it! Definitely going on my list to buy with holiday money!
Maybe it's a little like being pregnant, overdue, and just wanting to give birth. ( I've never been pregnant so that might not be a good analogy.)
I’ve been looking for a while for something to work wonders on my hair. I’m a bleaching offender I’m afraid and my strands have since paid for it. Almost a year now since I went drastically from a bright, dark red to yellow blonde (yellow because we couldn’t get all the red out so it had to do at the time). Since then I’ve highlighted until I reached the shade I’m at and now it sits in that famous Ombre look I told you about before (as you will see in the following photos).
An opening reception for the show will be held on Saturday, January 28 from 6-9pm. The exhibition runs through February 6. Brooklyn Artists Gym is located on 168 7th Avenue, 3rd Floor in Brooklyn NY. Call 718-858-9069 for more information. Hope to see you locals there!
Last night (25/2/12) I was put to the test. Mr and Mrs Q came for dinner. At the pub. Just down the road. They’re all enjoying a glass of wine. Me, I am just enjoying their company and some ginger beer. Rock ‘n’ roll. Four hours later, a delicious meal and several bottles of wine later, we decant from the pub. I’m remarkably clear-headed and congratulate myself on being a very good sober-drunk. Well done me.
These specters were only veils of what had been warm breath and soft laughter, shed tears and sweet memories.
Whedon’s been well, the best word is, an inspiration, to me over the years. I turned into a complete Buffy fan just before moving to New York and then as the show entered its last couple of years, after 9/11, after the Buffy musical, I found myself inhabiting the Buffy boards, especially alt.tv.buffy–v-slayer. Spending my nights there, sharing the love and kicking around the finer details and in those opening days of the 21st century, downloading tiny lo-res videos from IRC fserves.
KARL AMADEUS HARTMANN
"the hard way."
There will be a new challenge posted every week, instead of every 2 weeks. There will be different types of challenges posted here every Monday!! Each week will stay the same from month to month; when there is a fifth week in a month, the last week will be an extra week to participate for challenge 4.
With nearly thirty events including live drawing, talks, exhibitions, workshops, a drawing jam with Mesparrow and a dress-up party, the team behind it say this innovative festival will have something for everyone.
Next up was Malcolm Stewart, Deputy Solicitor General, Department of Justice, on behalf of the United States, as amicus curiae, supporting i4i. Early in the argument, Justice Sotomayor repeated Justice Alito's question regarding the language of section 282: " If Congress was intending to sweep up in the use of the word 'presumption' the need to overturn it by clear and convincing evidence, why did you need the second sentence saying that the other side now bore the burden of persuasion?"
The light cool breeze under a willow tree I will give myself completely. Upon the wet grass and dampen earth I will enter within you.
Just have to do a quick update on this mornings walk/jog.
The tuition has increased in surges and small steps. The percent of tuition increase from 1998 to 2001 ranged from 2 percent to 5 percent. The increases in tuition from 2002 to 2005 jumped from between 10 percent and 14.7 percent. The last three years have seen tuition increases from 2.2 percent in 2009 to 4.8 percent last year.
“What does this mean Penfold? What can we do now?”
EDIT 05/02/12: I found an image to better illustrate the problem of hazy conditions. Friends who are running a fitness group here in Busan asked me to take pictures of one of their training sessions, which was held outdoors, midday, at a beach on a partially cloudy day. Almost ALL of my shots came back with that hazy look, and it took me almost an entire day of tweaking in post to get a chunk of usable images. A polarizer would have helped here a lot, I think.
Yesterday, I enjoyed my moment in the spotlight at the Library of Congress (where I spoke, I would like it noted for the record, at the Mary Pickford Auditorium — isn’t that cool?), after which I signed 20 copies of IDENTITY CRISIS. Yes, I don’t quite believe it, either. I sent the bookstore 25 and I signed a whole bunch for people (wasn’t counting) and then the clerk (Tom — nice guy) asked me to sign the remaining five. So … 20 books, right? Wow.
I’m all for anti-Jihad, but not at the price of 69 innocent kids on their summer camp and especially not after accusing me for being behind it.
Aug 01 – Milwaukee, WI @ Marcus Ampitheater
The first signs of negativity should be addressed immediately. Talking with employees will help you understand the exact problems and the degree to which the problems are impacting your workplace. You will want to identify the exact employee groups who are experiencing the negativity, and the nature of the issues that sparked their unhappiness.
So the hellfire doctrine is another pagan borrowing. It is not Biblical.
Today I'm going to share with you my method of invisible hand applique. I use it for all my applique projects, but it's especially nice for hexagons. I know a lot of people just machine stitch around the edge, but I prefer not to see that stitching line so I have perfected invisibility. Now if only I could somehow apply it to myself and then sell my idea, I'd be rich. Rich I tell you!!
*We're still doing our research.
Does your master bedroom look like the picture below? If your bedroom has become the laundry, papers and junk catchall for your house, maybe it's time to shovel it all out and make your bedroom somewhere that you can't wait to head to at the end of the day to hang out with your husband and not just to go to sleep!
I never really liked Katniss. She is too confused about everything. And I particularly didn’t like her in Catching Fire. I loved her in the end though, how she had to give in to Peeta cos he wanted children. My imagination is doing funny stuff. I liked her in Mockingjay cos she was like a zombie most of the time. I found that funny.
II. The War Room: Developing a Tactical Response
There is not a car in sight as you walk the cobblestones. They are left on the side of the hill.
03--(03:21)--- Never Kill Another Man
The tactics and methods of counter insurgency do not change; they haven't since XIX Century.
There’s voice-to-text for emails and other text-input windows, but it doesn’t look like there’s full-blown Siri here, which seems odd. The voice is some guy’s voice, not the sultry Siri we’ve come to know (in the U.S.).
(oil on illustration board)
They are still building stamina in Daily 5. They've worked on Read to Self, Work on Writing, Read to Someone. Next week I'll integrate Word Work and eventually Listen to Reading. I am meeting with individual students to set a reading goal (comprehension, accuracy, fluency or expand vocabulary). This has been time consuming but worth it to have student working independently to practice their reading skills.
Shortly after its closure the pub was sold to Bolton Council and although furniture and bar fittings were stripped the building remains pretty much intact. The reason the council bought the pub was as part of an extension to the nearby Clarendon Street school. All the land from the present school down to the pub was to be bought and the school would be either extended or completely rebuilt. Included in the redevelopment was to be the old railway cutting right next to the school although council officials reported in early 2011 that the cutting is full of contaminated material which would have to be treated before the land is built upon. Presumably because of the increased costs the purchase of nearby land and property has been put on hold while the council looks for an alternative site. If so then presumably there is the possibility that the pub building could be sold again, but whether it would re-open as a pub in the current economic climate remains to be seen.
Now is the fun part...I belong to a trading team on Etsy and they had a trade event this weekend. I had never participated before but I thought what the heck. I first trade was for bath and body stuff from BragginRightsBath. I went on to make 14 more trades and will be receiveing 14 packages with little gifts for me and the ones that I love. Here is a list of all the Trade-A-Holics I would like to thanks for making my first Trade and Stay so fun. Thank you sooo much ladies!!!
Other music I’ve been listening to since I released a batch of music to myself 10/2005:
blue and green beads
Tussock hills and breathtaking blue water shining in the bright sunshine.
- 1st cold beer of the summer
A tasty dish commonly get going access Java and Bali, is grilled spicy beef brisket mask a distinctive wan taste, served disguise close chilli flavouring.
All you have to do is go on Kindle, download free to laptop or PC (if you don’t have a Kindle) and then download Jacob Bear’s First Christmas and give a quick comment and like! Easy!
Ian McLagan - Keyboards
Sometimes I live in the future instead of the now.
Thank You and Happy Crafting !! :-) xx
I finished with a stroll down to the Lakeside Cafe, built atop the victorian boathouse. (concerts in the park by the likes of The Rolling Stones, Madonna, Bruce Springsteen, Michael Jackson paid for the cafe, and other infrastructure to be built)
And the Paul supporters wonder why people make fun of them.
Another night you actually broke clamshell mode and even though you didn’t come see me at the bar, you texted and said I could stay the night and I did. When I came to bed, you woke up a little, and said, “Oh you’re here! Roll over, I want to spoon.” and I did and you promptly fell back asleep. And I fell asleep in your arms, smiling.
......and I am soooo happy, so so so so happy!
About the Author - Jack Caldwell is an author, amateur historian, professional economic developer, playwright, and like many Cajuns, a darn good cook. Born and raised in the Bayou County of Louisiana, Jack and his wife, Barbara, are Hurricane Katrina victims who now make the upper Midwest their home.
World-Famous Guitarist, Paco de Lucia...on being asked what he uses on his nails...
